Texas statutes.
OCCUPATIONS CODE

TITLE 10. OCCUPATIONS RELATED TO LAW ENFORCEMENT AND SECURITY

CHAPTER 1702. PRIVATE SECURITY

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 1702.001. SHORT TITLE. This chapter may be cited as the Private Security Act.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.551(b), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 1702.002. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Alarm system" means:

(A) electronic equipment and devices designed to detect or signal:

(i) an unauthorized entry or attempted entry of a person or object into a residence, business, or area monitored by the system; or

(ii) the occurrence of a robbery or other emergency;

(B) electronic equipment and devices using a computer or data processor designed to control the access of a person, vehicle, or object through a door, gate, or entrance into the controlled area of a residence or business; or

(C) a television camera or still camera system that:

(i) records or archives images of property or individuals in a public or private area of a residence or business; or

(ii) is monitored by security personnel or services.

(1-a) For purposes of Subdivision (1), the term "alarm system" does not include a telephone entry system, an operator for opening or closing a residential or commercial gate or door, or an accessory used only to activate a gate or door, if the system, operator, or accessory is not monitored by security personnel or a security service and does not send a signal to which law enforcement or emergency services respond.

(1-b) Repealed by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.114(b)(1), eff. September 1, 2019.

(2) "Branch office" means an office that is:

(A) identified to the public as a place from which business is conducted, solicited, or advertised; and

(B) at a place other than the principal place of business as shown in department records.

(3) Repealed by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.114(b)(2), eff. September 1, 2019.

(4) "Commission" means the Public Safety Commission.

(5) "Commissioned security officer" means a security officer to whom a security officer commission has been issued by the department.

(5-a) "Committee" means the Texas Private Security Advisory Committee established under this chapter.

(5-b) "Company license" means a license issued by the department that entitles a person to operate as a security services contractor or investigations company.

(5-c) "Department" means the Department of Public Safety of the State of Texas.

(6) "Detection device" means an electronic device used as a part of an alarm system, including a control, communications device, motion detector, door or window switch, sound detector, vibration detector, light beam, pressure mat, wiring, or similar device.

(6-a) "Electronic access control device" means an electronic, electrical, or computer-based device, including a telephone entry system, that allows access to a controlled area of a business, but that is not monitored by security personnel or services and does not send a signal to which law enforcement or emergency services respond. The term does not include:

(A) a mechanical device, such as a deadbolt or lock; or

(B) an operator for opening or closing a commercial gate or door or an accessory, such as a fixed or portable transmitter, card-reader, or keypad, if the operator or accessory is used only to activate the gate or door and is not connected to an alarm system.

(6-b) Repealed by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.114(b)(3), eff. September 1, 2019.

(7) "Extra job coordinator" means a peace officer who:

(A) is employed full-time by the state or a political subdivision of the state; and

(B) schedules other peace officers to provide guard, patrolman, or watchman services in a private capacity who are:

(i) employed full-time by the state or a political subdivision of the state; and

(ii) not employed by the extra job coordinator.

(8) "Firearm" has the meaning assigned by Section 46.01, Penal Code.

(8-a) "Individual license" means a license issued by the department that entitles an individual to perform a service regulated by this chapter for a company license holder, including a personal protection officer license.

(9) "Insurance agent" means:

(A) a person licensed under Subchapter B, C, D, or E, Chapter 4051, or Chapter 981, Insurance Code;

(B) a salaried, state, or special agent; or

(C) a person authorized to represent an insurance fund or pool created by a local government under Chapter 791, Government Code.

(10) "Investigations company" means a person who performs the activities described by Section 1702.104.

(11) Repealed by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.114(b)(4), eff. September 1, 2019.

(12) Repealed by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.114(b)(5), eff. September 1, 2019.

(13) Repealed by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.114(b)(6), eff. September 1, 2019.

(14) Repealed by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.114(b)(7), eff. September 1, 2019.

Text of subdivision effective until January 01, 2025

(15) "Peace officer" means a person who is a peace officer under Article 2.12, Code of Criminal Procedure.

Text of subdivision effective on January 01, 2025

(15) "Peace officer" means a person who is a peace officer under Article 2A.001, Code of Criminal Procedure.

(16) "Person" includes an individual, firm, association, company, partnership, corporation, nonprofit organization, institution, or similar entity. Section 311.005(2), Government Code, does not apply to this subdivision.

(16-a) "Personal protection officer" means a person who performs the activities described by Section 1702.202.

(17) "Personal protection officer license" means a license issued by the department that entitles an individual to act as a personal protection officer.

(18) "Private investigator" means an individual who performs one or more services described by Section 1702.104.

(19) Repealed by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.114(b)(8), eff. September 1, 2019.

(20) Repealed by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.114(b)(9), eff. September 1, 2019.

(20-a) "Security officer" means a person who performs the activities described by Section 1702.222.

(21) "Security officer commission" means an authorization issued by the department that entitles a security officer to carry a firearm.

(22) "Security services contractor" means a person who performs the activities described by Section 1702.102.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.552, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 898, Sec. 1, eff. June 20, 2003; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 936, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1276, Sec. 10A.545, eff. Sept. 1, 2003; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., 3rd C.S., ch. 10, Sec. 2.01, eff. Oct. 20, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 728 (H.B. 2018), Sec. 11.151, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1155 (H.B. 3140), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2005.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 17.001(58-a), eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4.01, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4.102(1), eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4B.01, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1084 (H.B. 3433), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.001, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.114(b)(1), eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.114(b)(2), eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.114(b)(3), eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.114(b)(4), eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.114(b)(5), eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.114(b)(6), eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.114(b)(7), eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.114(b)(8), eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.114(b)(9), eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 2.151, eff. January 1, 2025.

Sec. 1702.004. GENERAL SCOPE OF REGULATION. (a) The department:

(1) licenses investigations companies and security services contractors;

(2) issues commissions to certain security officers;

(3) licenses certain security officers engaged in the personal protection of individuals;

(4) licenses:

(A) certain individuals connected with a company license holder; and

(B) certain individuals employed in a field connected to private investigation or private security; and

(5) regulates company license holders, security officers, and individual license holders under this chapter.

(b) The commission shall adopt rules necessary to comply with Chapter 53. In its rules under this section, the commission shall list the specific offenses for each category of regulated persons for which a conviction would constitute grounds for the department to take action under Section 53.021.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.554, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 906 (H.B. 2833), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4.02, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.002, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.005. DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETY; REFERENCES. (a) The department shall administer this chapter.

(b) A reference in this chapter or another law to the Texas Commission on Private Security or the Texas Private Security Board means the department.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., 3rd C.S., ch. 10, Sec. 2.02, eff. Oct. 20, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.003, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.006. FOREIGN ENTITY REGISTRATION. Licensure under this chapter does not exempt a foreign entity from the registration requirements of Chapter 9, Business Organizations Code.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4B.04, eff. September 1, 2009.

SUBCHAPTER B. TEXAS PRIVATE SECURITY ADVISORY COMMITTEE

Sec. 1702.021. COMMITTEE MEMBERSHIP; APPLICABILITY OF OTHER LAW. (a) The Texas Private Security Advisory Committee consists of seven members appointed by the commission as follows:

(1) three public members, each of whom is a citizen of the United States;

(2) one member who is licensed under this chapter as a private investigator;

(3) one member who is licensed under this chapter as an alarm systems company;

(4) one member who is licensed under this chapter as the owner or operator of a guard company; and

(5) one member who is licensed under this chapter as a locksmith.

(b) Appointments to the committee shall be made without regard to the race, color, disability, sex, religion, age, or national origin of the appointee.

(c) Chapter 2110, Government Code, does not apply to the size, composition, or duration of the advisory committee or to the appointment of the committee's presiding officer.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.556, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1170, Sec. 34.01, eff. Sept. 1, 2003; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., 3rd C.S., ch. 10, Sec. 2.03, eff. Oct. 20, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4.04, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 657 (H.B. 1093), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.005, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.023. ELIGIBILITY OF PUBLIC MEMBERS. The committee's public members must be representatives of the general public. A person may not be a public member of the committee if the person or the person's spouse:

(1) is registered, commissioned, certified, or licensed by a regulatory agency in the field of private investigations or private security;

(2) is employed by or participates in the management of a business entity or other organization regulated by or receiving money from the department;

(3) owns or controls, directly or indirectly, more than a 10 percent interest in a business entity or other organization regulated by or receiving money from the department; or

(4) uses or receives a substantial amount of tangible goods, services, or money from the department other than compensation or reimbursement authorized by law for committee membership, attendance, or expenses.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.558, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4.05, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.006, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.024. MEMBERSHIP AND EMPLOYEE RESTRICTIONS. (a) In this section, "Texas trade association" means a cooperative and voluntarily joined association of business or professional competitors in this state designed to assist its members and its industry or profession in dealing with mutual business or professional problems and in promoting their common interests.

(b) A person may not be a committee member, and may not be a department employee whose primary duties include private security regulation and who is employed in a "bona fide executive, administrative, or professional capacity," as that phrase is used for purposes of establishing an exemption to the overtime provisions of the federal Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938 (29 U.S.C. Section 201 et seq.), and its subsequent amendments, if:

(1) the person is an officer, employee, or paid consultant of a Texas trade association in the field of private investigation or private security; or

(2) the person's spouse is an officer, manager, or paid consultant of a Texas trade association in the field of private investigation or private security.

(c) A person may not be a committee member or act as general counsel to the committee or department if the person is required to register as a lobbyist under Chapter 305, Government Code, because of the person's activities for compensation on behalf of a profession related to the operation of the committee.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.559, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4.06, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.007, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.025. TERMS; VACANCIES. (a) The committee members serve staggered six-year terms, with the terms of two or three members expiring on January 31 of each odd-numbered year.

(b) If a vacancy occurs during the term of a committee member, the commission shall appoint a new member to fill the unexpired term.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.560(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1170, Sec. 34.02, eff. Sept. 1, 2003; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., 3rd C.S., ch. 10, Sec. 2.04, eff. Oct. 20, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.008, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.026. OFFICERS. (a) The commission shall designate one committee member as presiding officer to serve in that capacity at the will of the commission. The commission shall designate the presiding officer without regard to race, creed, color, disability, sex, religion, age, or national origin.

(b) The committee shall elect from among its members an assistant presiding officer and a secretary to serve two-year terms beginning on September 1 of each odd-numbered year.

(c) The presiding officer of the committee or, in the absence of the presiding officer, the assistant presiding officer shall preside at each committee meeting and perform the other duties prescribed by this chapter.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.561(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., 3rd C.S., ch. 10, Sec. 2.04, eff. Oct. 20, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.009, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.027. GROUNDS FOR REMOVAL. (a) It is a ground for removal from the committee that a member:

(1) does not have the qualifications required by Section 1702.021 at the time of appointment;

(2) does not maintain the qualifications required by Section 1702.021 during service on the committee;

(3) is ineligible for membership under Section 1702.023 or 1702.024;

(4) cannot, because of illness or disability, discharge the member's duties for a substantial part of the member's term; or

(5) is absent from more than half of the regularly scheduled committee meetings that the member is eligible to attend during a calendar year without an excuse approved by a majority vote of the committee.

(b) The validity of an action of the committee is not affected by the fact that it is taken when a ground for removal of a committee member exists.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.114(b)(10), eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.562, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4.07, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.010, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.114(b)(10), eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.028. REIMBURSEMENT. A committee member may not receive compensation for service on the advisory committee but is entitled to reimbursement for actual and necessary expenses incurred in performing the functions as a member of the committee, subject to the General Appropriations Act.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.563, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4.08, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.011, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.029. MEETINGS. The committee shall meet at least quarterly.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.564, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4.09, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.012, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.031. DUTIES OF ADVISORY COMMITTEE. The committee shall provide advice and recommendations to the department and commission on technical matters relevant to the administration of this chapter and the regulation of private security industries.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.013, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.032. COMMISSION LIAISON. The commission shall designate a commission member to serve as a liaison to the committee.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.013, eff. September 1, 2019.

SUBCHAPTER C. CHIEF ADMINISTRATOR AND PERSONNEL

Sec. 1702.041. CHIEF ADMINISTRATOR. (a) The chief administrator is responsible for the administration of this chapter under the direction of the public safety director. The chief administrator shall perform duties as prescribed by the public safety director.

(b) The chief administrator is a full-time employee of the department. A committee member may not serve as chief administrator.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.566, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4.12, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.014, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.042. PERSONNEL; CONFLICT OF INTEREST. An employee of the department whose primary duties include private security regulation may not:

(1) have a financial or business interest, contingent or otherwise, in a security services contractor or investigations company; or

(2) be licensed under this chapter.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.567, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4.13, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 1702.044. QUALIFICATIONS AND STANDARDS OF CONDUCT INFORMATION. The chief administrator or the chief administrator's designee shall provide to committee members and to department employees, as often as necessary, information regarding the requirements for service as a committee member or employment under this chapter, including information regarding a person's responsibilities under applicable laws relating to standards of conduct for state officers or employees.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.569, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4.15, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.015, eff. September 1, 2019.

SUBCHAPTER D. POWERS AND DUTIES

Sec. 1702.061. GENERAL POWERS AND DUTIES. (a) The commission shall adopt rules and general policies to guide the department in the administration of this chapter.

(b) The rules and policies adopted by the commission under Subsection (a) must be consistent with this chapter and other commission rules adopted under this chapter and with any other applicable law, state rule, or federal regulation.

(c) The commission has the powers and duties to:

(1) determine the qualifications of company license holders, individual license holders, and commissioned security officers;

(2) investigate alleged violations of this chapter and of commission rules;

(3) adopt rules necessary to implement this chapter; and

(4) establish and enforce standards governing the safety and conduct of each person regulated under this chapter.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.573(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4.17, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.017, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.062. FEES. (a) The commission by rule shall establish reasonable and necessary fees that produce sufficient revenue to administer this chapter. The fees may not produce unnecessary fund balances.

(b) The department may charge a fee each time the department requires a person regulated under this chapter to resubmit a set of fingerprints for processing by the department during the application process for a company license, individual license, or security officer commission. The commission shall set the fee in an amount that is reasonable and necessary to cover the administrative expenses related to processing the fingerprints.

(c) A person whose pocket card has not expired is not eligible to receive from the department another pocket card in the same classification in which the pocket card is held.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.574, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 593, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1278 (H.B. 2303), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4.19, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.018, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.063. USE OF FINES. The fines collected under this chapter may not be used to administer this chapter.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.575, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.019, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.0635. RESTRICTIONS ON CERTAIN RULES. The commission may not adopt rules or establish unduly restrictive experience or education requirements that limit a person's ability to be licensed as an electronic access control device company or be licensed as an electronic access control device installer.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 936, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4.21, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.020, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.064. RULES RESTRICTING ADVERTISING OR COMPETITIVE BIDDING. (a) The commission may not adopt rules restricting advertising or competitive bidding by a person regulated under this chapter except to prohibit false, misleading, or deceptive practices by the person.

(b) The commission may not include in its rules to prohibit false, misleading, or deceptive practices by a person regulated under this chapter a rule that:

(1) restricts the person's use of any medium for advertising;

(2) restricts the person's personal appearance or use of the person's personal voice in an advertisement;

(3) relates to the size or duration of an advertisement by the person; or

(4) restricts the person's advertisement under a trade name.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.576, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4.22, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.021, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.0645. PAYMENT OF FEES AND FINES. (a) The commission may adopt rules regarding the method of payment of a fee or a fine assessed under this chapter.

(b) Rules adopted under this section may:

(1) authorize the use of electronic funds transfer or a valid credit card issued by a financial institution chartered by a state or the federal government or by a nationally recognized credit organization approved by the department; and

(2) require the payment of a discount or a reasonable service charge for a credit card payment in addition to the fee or the fine.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.577(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4.23, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.022, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.067. RECORDS; EVIDENCE. An official record of the department related to this chapter or an affidavit by the chief administrator as to the content of the record is prima facie evidence of a matter required to be kept by the department.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.580, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4.25, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.023, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.068. APPEAL BOND NOT REQUIRED. The department is not required to give an appeal bond in any cause arising under this chapter.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.581, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4.26, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.024, eff. September 1, 2019.

SUBCHAPTER E. PUBLIC INTEREST INFORMATION

Sec. 1702.084. PUBLIC ACCESS TO CERTAIN RECORDS OF DISCIPLINARY ACTIONS. (a) The department shall make available to the public through a toll-free telephone number, Internet website, or other easily accessible medium determined by the department the following information relating to a disciplinary action taken during the preceding three years regarding a person regulated under this chapter:

(1) the identity of the person;

(2) the nature of the complaint that was the basis of the disciplinary action taken against the person; and

(3) the disciplinary action taken by the commission.

(b) In providing the information, the department shall present the information in an impartial manner, use language that is commonly understood, and, if possible, avoid jargon specific to the security industry.

(c) The department shall update the information on a monthly basis.

(d) The department shall maintain the confidentiality of information regarding the identification of a complainant.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.586(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4.30, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.026, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.085. CONFIDENTIALITY OF RECORDS. Records maintained by the department under this chapter on the home address, home telephone number, driver's license number, or social security number of an applicant or a company license holder, individual license holder, or security officer commission holder are confidential and are not subject to mandatory disclosure under Chapter 552, Government Code.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 906 (H.B. 2833), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.027, eff. September 1, 2019.

SUBCHAPTER F. LICENSING AND DUTIES OF INVESTIGATIONS COMPANIES AND SECURITY SERVICES CONTRACTORS

Sec. 1702.101. INVESTIGATIONS COMPANY LICENSE REQUIRED. Unless the person holds a license as an investigations company, a person may not:

(1) act as an investigations company;

(2) offer to perform the services of an investigations company; or

(3) engage in business activity for which a license is required under this chapter.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 1702.102. SECURITY SERVICES CONTRACTOR LICENSE REQUIRED; SCOPE OF LICENSE. (a) Unless the person holds a license as a security services contractor, a person may not:

(1) act as an alarm systems company, armored car company, courier company, guard company, or locksmith company;

(2) offer to perform the services of a company in Subdivision (1); or

(3) engage in business activity for which a license is required under this chapter.

(b) A person licensed only as a security services contractor may not conduct an investigation other than an investigation incidental to the loss, misappropriation, or concealment of property that the person has been engaged to protect.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 906 (H.B. 2833), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.028, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.1025. ELECTRONIC ACCESS CONTROL DEVICE COMPANY LICENSE REQUIRED; SCOPE OF LICENSE. (a) Unless the person holds a license as an electronic access control device company, a person may not:

(1) act as an electronic access control device company;

(2) offer to perform the services of an electronic access control device company; or

(3) engage in business activity for which a license is required under this chapter.

(b) A person licensed as an electronic access control device company may not install alarm systems unless otherwise licensed to install alarm systems under this chapter.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 936, Sec. 3, eff. Jan. 1, 2004.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.029, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.103. CLASSIFICATION AND LIMITATION OF COMPANY LICENSES. (a) The company license classifications are:

(1) Class A: investigations company license, covering operations of an investigations company;

(2) Class B: security services contractor license, covering operations of a security services contractor;

(3) Class C: covering the operations included within Class A and Class B;

(4) Class F: level III training school license; and

(5) Class O: alarm level I training school license.

(b) A company license described by this chapter does not authorize the company license holder to perform a service for which the company license holder has not qualified. A person may not engage in an operation outside the scope of that person's company license. The department shall indicate on the company license the services the company license holder is authorized to perform. The company license holder may not perform a service unless it is indicated on the company license.

(c) A company license is not assignable unless the assignment is approved in advance by the department.

(d) The commission shall prescribe by rule the procedure under which a company license may be terminated.

(e) The commission by rule may establish other company license classifications for activities expressly regulated by this chapter and may establish qualifications and practice requirements consistent with this chapter for those company license classifications.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.587, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 936, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4.31, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.030, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.104. INVESTIGATIONS COMPANY. (a) A person acts as an investigations company for the purposes of this chapter if the person:

(1) engages in the business of obtaining or furnishing, or accepts employment to obtain or furnish, information related to:

(A) crime or wrongs done or threatened against a person, state, or the United States;

(B) the identity, habits, business, occupation, knowledge, efficiency, loyalty, movement, location, affiliations, associations, transactions, acts, reputation, or character of a person;

(C) the location, disposition, or recovery of lost or stolen property; or

(D) the cause or responsibility for a fire, libel, loss, accident, damage, or injury to a person or to property;

(2) engages in the business of securing, or accepts employment to secure, evidence for use before a court, board, officer, or investigating committee;

(3) engages in the business of securing, or accepts employment to secure, the electronic tracking of the location of an individual or motor vehicle other than for criminal justice purposes by or on behalf of a governmental entity; or

(4) engages in the business of protecting, or accepts employment to protect, an individual from bodily harm through the use of a personal protection officer.

(b) For purposes of Subsection (a)(1), obtaining or furnishing information includes information obtained or furnished through the review and analysis of, and the investigation into the content of, computer-based data not available to the public. The repair or maintenance of a computer does not constitute an investigation for purposes of this section and does not require licensing under this chapter if:

(1) the review or analysis of computer-based data is performed only to diagnose a computer or software problem;

(2) there is no intent to obtain or furnish information described by Subsection (a)(1); and

(3) the discovery of any information described by Subsection (a)(1) is inadvertent.

(c) The review and analysis of computer-based data for the purpose of preparing for or responding to a cybersecurity event does not constitute an investigation for purposes of this section and does not require licensing under this chapter.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 906 (H.B. 2833), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4.32, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 509 (S.B. 64), Sec. 20, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.105. ALARM SYSTEMS COMPANY. (a) A person acts as an alarm systems company for the purposes of this chapter if the person sells, installs, services, monitors, or responds to an alarm system or detection device.

(b) An alarm systems company may sell, install, maintain, or service, or offer to sell, install, maintain, or service, an electronic access control device or a mechanical security device that is capable of activation through a wireless signal. An alarm systems company may not rekey an electronic access control device or mechanical security device that can be activated by a key. This subsection does not apply to a mechanical security device or electronic access control device installed in a motor vehicle.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1084 (H.B. 3433), Sec. 2, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 1702.1055. ELECTRONIC ACCESS CONTROL DEVICE COMPANY. A person acts as an electronic access control device company for the purposes of this chapter if the person installs or maintains an electronic access control device.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 936, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Sec. 1702.1056. LOCKSMITH COMPANY. (a) A person acts as a locksmith company for the purposes of this chapter if the person:

(1) sells, installs, services, or maintains, or offers to sell, install, service, or maintain, mechanical security devices, including deadbolts and locks;

(2) advertises services offered by the company using the term "locksmith"; or

(3) includes the term "locksmith" in the company's name.

(b) This section does not apply to a hotel, as that term is defined by Section 156.001, Tax Code.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 936, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1102 (H.B. 2243), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4B.05, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 1702.106. ARMORED CAR COMPANY. A person acts as an armored car company for the purposes of this chapter if the person provides secured and protected transportation of valuables, including money, coins, bullion, securities, bonds, or jewelry.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 1702.107. COURIER COMPANY. A person acts as a courier company for purposes of this chapter if the person transports or offers to transport under armed guard an item that requires expeditious delivery, including a document, map, stock, bond, or check.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 1702.108. GUARD COMPANY. A person acts as a guard company for the purposes of this chapter if the person employs an individual described by Section 1702.323(d) or engages in the business of or undertakes to provide a private watchman, guard, or street patrol service on a contractual basis for another person to:

(1) prevent entry, larceny, vandalism, abuse, fire, or trespass on private property;

(2) prevent, observe, or detect unauthorized activity on private property;

(3) control, regulate, or direct the movement of the public, whether by vehicle or otherwise, only to the extent and for the time directly and specifically required to ensure the protection of property;

(4) protect an individual from bodily harm including through the use of a personal protection officer; or

(5) perform a function similar to a function listed in this section.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.588, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 1702.110. APPLICATION FOR COMPANY LICENSE. (a) An application for a company license under this chapter must be in the form prescribed by the department and include:

(1) the full name and business address of the applicant;

(2) the name under which the applicant intends to do business;

(3) a statement as to the general nature of the business in which the applicant intends to engage;

(4) a statement as to the classification for which the applicant requests qualification;

(5) if the applicant is an entity other than an individual, the full name and residence address of each partner, officer who oversees the security-related aspects of the business, and director of the applicant;

(6) if the applicant is an individual, the fingerprints of the applicant or, if the applicant is an entity other than an individual, of each officer who oversees the security-related aspects of the business and of each partner or shareholder who owns at least a 25 percent interest in the applicant, provided in the manner prescribed by the department;

(7) a verified statement of the applicant's experience qualifications in the particular classification in which the applicant is applying;

(8) a report from the department stating the applicant's record of any convictions for a Class B misdemeanor or equivalent offense or a greater offense;

(9) the social security number of the individual making the application; and

(10) other information, evidence, statements, or documents required by the department.

(b) An applicant for a company license as a security services contractor shall maintain a physical address within this state and provide that address to the department. The commission shall adopt rules to enable an out-of-state company license holder to comply with this subsection.

(c) The department may return an application for a company license as incomplete if the applicant submits payment of a fee that is returned for insufficient funds and the applicant has received notice and an opportunity to provide payment in full.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.589, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4B.06, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1084 (H.B. 3433), Sec. 3, eff. June 14, 2013.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.031, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.112. FORM OF COMPANY LICENSE. The department shall prescribe the form of a company license. The company license must include:

(1) the name of the company license holder;

(2) the name under which the company license holder is to operate;

(3) the company license number and the date the company license was issued; and

(4) a photograph of the company license holder, affixed to the company license at the time the company license is issued by the department.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.591, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4B.07, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.032, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.113. GENERAL QUALIFICATIONS FOR COMPANY LICENSE OR SECURITY OFFICER COMMISSION. (a) An applicant for a company license or security officer commission must be at least 18 years of age and must not:

(1) at the time of application be charged under an information or indictment with the commission of a Class A or Class B misdemeanor or felony offense determined to be disqualifying by commission rule;

(2) have been found by a court to be incompetent by reason of a mental defect or disease and not have been restored to competency;

(3) have been dishonorably discharged from the United States armed services, discharged from the United States armed services under other conditions determined by the commission to be prohibitive, or dismissed from the United States armed services if a commissioned officer in the United States armed services; or

(4) be required to register in this or any other state as a sex offender.

(b) Repealed by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1084, Sec. 17, eff. June 14, 2013.

(c) Repealed by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1084, Sec. 17, eff. June 14, 2013.

(d) Repealed by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.114(b)(23), eff. September 1, 2019.

(e) Repealed by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146, Sec. 4.102(7), eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.592(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 906 (H.B. 2833), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4.34, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4.102(7), eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1084 (H.B. 3433), Sec. 4, eff. June 14, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1084 (H.B. 3433), Sec. 17, eff. June 14, 2013.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.033, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.034, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.114(b)(23), eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.114. ADDITIONAL QUALIFICATIONS FOR INVESTIGATIONS COMPANY LICENSE. (a) An applicant for a company license to engage in the business of an investigations company must have, before the date of the application, three consecutive years' experience in the investigative field as an employee or owner of an investigations company or satisfy other requirements set by the commission.

(b) The applicant's experience must be:

(1) reviewed by the department; and

(2) determined to be adequate to qualify the applicant to engage in the business of an investigations company.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.593, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4.35, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.035, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.115. ADDITIONAL QUALIFICATIONS FOR SECURITY SERVICES CONTRACTOR LICENSE. (a) An applicant for a company license to engage in the business of a security services contractor must have, before the date of the application, two consecutive years' experience in each security services field for which the person applies as an employee or owner of a security services contractor or satisfy other requirements set by the commission.

(b) The applicant's experience must have been obtained legally and must be:

(1) reviewed by the department; and

(2) determined to be adequate to qualify the applicant to engage in the business of a security services contractor.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.594, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4.36, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.036, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.117. EXAMINATION. (a) The department shall require an applicant for a company license under this chapter to demonstrate qualifications in the person's company license classification, including knowledge of applicable state laws and commission rules, by taking an examination to be determined by the commission.

(b) Payment of the application fee entitles the applicant to take one examination without additional charge. A person who fails the examination must pay a reexamination fee to take a subsequent examination.

(c) The commission shall set the reexamination fee in an amount not to exceed the amount of the renewal fee for the company license classification for which application was made.

(d) The department shall develop and provide to a person who applies to take the examination under Subsection (a) material containing all applicable state laws and commission rules.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.596(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4.38, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.037, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.118. EXAMINATION RESULTS. (a) Not later than the 30th day after the date a person takes a licensing examination under this chapter, the department shall notify the person of the examination results.

(b) If an examination is graded or reviewed by a testing service:

(1) the department shall notify the person of the examination results not later than the 14th day after the date the department receives the results from the testing service; and

(2) if notice of the examination results will be delayed for longer than 90 days after the examination date, the department shall notify the person of the reason for the delay before the 90th day.

(c) The department may require a testing service to notify a person of the results of the person's examination.

(d) If requested in writing by a person who fails a licensing examination administered under this chapter, the department shall furnish the person with an analysis of the person's performance on the examination.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.597, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4.39, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.038, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.1183. RECIPROCAL COMPANY LICENSE FOR CERTAIN APPLICANTS. (a) The department may waive any prerequisite to obtaining a company license for an applicant who holds a company license issued by another jurisdiction with which this state has a reciprocity agreement.

(b) The commission may make an agreement, subject to the approval of the governor, with another state to allow for licensing by reciprocity.

(c) The commission shall adopt rules under which the commission may waive any prerequisite to obtaining a company license for, and credit experience for a company license requirement to, an individual who the commission determines has acceptable experience gained during service in a branch of the United States armed forces, including the United States Coast Guard.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.598, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4.40, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 989 (H.B. 2135), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.039, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.1186. PROVISIONAL COMPANY LICENSE. (a) The department may issue a provisional company license to an applicant currently licensed in another jurisdiction who seeks an equivalent company license in this state and who:

(1) has been licensed in good standing as an investigations company or security services contractor for at least two years in another jurisdiction, including a foreign country, that has licensing requirements substantially equivalent to the requirements of this chapter;

(2) has passed a national or other examination recognized by the commission relating to the practice of private investigations or security services contracting; and

(3) is sponsored by a person licensed by the department under this chapter with whom the provisional company license holder will practice during the time the person holds a provisional company license.

(b) A provisional company license is valid until the date the department approves or denies the provisional company license holder's application for a company license. The department shall issue a company license under this chapter to the provisional company license holder if:

(1) the provisional company license holder is eligible to be licensed under Section 1702.1183; or

(2) the provisional company license holder:

(A) passes the part of the examination under Section 1702.117(a) that relates to the applicant's knowledge and understanding of the laws and rules relating to the practice of an investigations company or security services contractor in this state;

(B) is verified by the department as meeting the academic and experience requirements for a company license under this chapter; and

(C) satisfies any other licensing requirements under this chapter.

(c) The department must approve or deny a provisional company license holder's application for a company license not later than the 180th day after the date the provisional company license is issued. The department may extend the 180-day period if the results of an examination have not been received by the department before the end of that period.

(d) The commission may establish a fee for provisional company licenses in an amount reasonable and necessary to cover the cost of issuing the company license.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.598, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4.41, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.040, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.122. TEMPORARY CONTINUATION OF COMPANY LICENSE HOLDER'S BUSINESS. Under the terms provided by commission rule, a company license holder's business may continue for a temporary period if the individual on the basis of whose qualifications a company license under this chapter has been obtained ceases to be connected with the company license holder.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.602, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4.43, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.041, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.123. INSURANCE; BOND. (a) A company license holder shall maintain on file with the department at all times the surety bond and certificate of insurance required by this chapter.

(b) The commission shall immediately suspend the company license of a company license holder who violates Subsection (a).

(c) The commission may rescind the company license suspension if the company license holder provides proof to the commission that the bond or the insurance coverage is still in effect. The company license holder must provide the proof in a form satisfactory to the commission not later than the 10th day after the date the company license is suspended.

(d) After suspension of the company license, the commission may not reinstate the company license until an application, in the form prescribed by the commission, is filed accompanied by a proper bond, insurance certificate, or both. The commission may deny the application notwithstanding the applicant's compliance with this section:

(1) for a reason that would justify suspending, revoking, or denying a company license; or

(2) if, during the suspension, the applicant performs a practice for which a company license is required.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.603, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4.44, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.042, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.124. INSURANCE REQUIREMENT. (a) An applicant is not eligible for a company license unless the applicant provides as part of the application:

(1) a certificate of insurance or other documentary evidence of a general liability insurance policy countersigned by an insurance agent licensed in this state; or

(2) a certificate of insurance for surplus lines coverage obtained under Chapter 981, Insurance Code, through a licensed Texas surplus lines agent resident in this state.

(b) The general liability insurance policy must be conditioned to pay on behalf of the company license holder damages that the company license holder becomes legally obligated to pay because of bodily injury, property damage, or personal injury, caused by an event involving the principal, or an officer, agent, or employee of the principal, in the conduct of any activity or service for which the company license holder is licensed under this chapter.

(c) The insurance policy must contain minimum limits of:

(1) $100,000 for each occurrence for bodily injury and property damage;

(2) $50,000 for each occurrence for personal injury; and

(3) a total aggregate amount of $200,000 for all occurrences.

(d) A person who is licensed to install and service fire alarms under Article 5.43-2, Insurance Code, complies with the insurance requirements of this section by complying with the insurance requirement of that article if the insurance held by the applicant complies with the requirements of this section in amounts and types of coverage.

(e) An insurance certificate executed and filed with the department under this chapter remains in effect until the insurer terminates future liability by providing to the department at least 10 days' notice of the intent to terminate liability.

(f) In addition to the requirements of this section, an applicant or company license holder shall provide and maintain a certificate of insurance or other documentary evidence of insurance sufficient to cover all of the business activities of the applicant or company license holder related to private security.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.604, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 936, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 2003; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1276, Sec. 10A.546, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 906 (H.B. 2833), Sec. 7, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1084 (H.B. 3433), Sec. 6, eff. June 14, 2013.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.043, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.125. BOND REQUIREMENT. A bond executed and filed with the department under this chapter remains in effect until the surety terminates future liability by providing to the department at least 30 days' notice of the intent to terminate liability.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.605, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4.45, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.044, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.127. COMPANY LICENSE HOLDER EMPLOYEES; RECORDS. (a) A company license holder may be legally responsible for the conduct in the company license holder's business of each employee of the company license holder while the employee is performing assigned duties for the company license holder.

(b) A company license holder shall maintain a record containing information related to the company license holder's employees as required by the commission.

(c) A company license holder shall maintain for inspection by the department at the company license holder's principal place of business or branch office two recent color photographs, of a type required by the commission, of each applicant, individual license holder, commissioned security officer, and employee of the company license holder.

(d) A company license holder shall maintain records required under this chapter at a physical address within this state and provide that address to the department.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.607, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4B.09, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.045, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.128. POSTING OF COMPANY LICENSE REQUIRED. A company license holder shall at all times post the person's license in a conspicuous place in:

(1) the principal place of business of the company license holder; and

(2) each branch office of the company license holder.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.046, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.129. NOTICE OF CERTAIN CHANGES; BRANCH OFFICES. (a) A company license holder shall notify the department not later than the 14th day after the date of:

(1) a change of address for the company license holder's principal place of business;

(2) a change of a name under which the company license holder does business; or

(3) a change in the company license holder's officers or partners.

(b) A company license holder shall notify the department in writing not later than the 14th day after the date a branch office:

(1) is established;

(2) is closed; or

(3) changes address or location.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.608, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4.46, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.047, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.130. USE OF CERTAIN TITLES, UNIFORMS, INSIGNIA, OR IDENTIFICATIONS PROHIBITED. (a) A company license holder, or an officer, director, partner, or employee of a company license holder, may not:

(1) use a title, an insignia, or an identification card, wear a uniform, or make a statement with the intent to give an impression that the person is connected with the federal government, a state government, or a political subdivision of a state government; or

(2) use a title, an insignia, or an identification card or wear a uniform containing the designation "police."

(b) Subsection (a) does not prohibit a commissioned security officer employed by a political subdivision of this state from using a title, insignia, or identification card, wearing a uniform, or making a statement indicating the employment of that individual by the political subdivision.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.048, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.131. ADVERTISING. An advertisement by a company license holder soliciting or advertising business must contain the company license holder's company name and address as stated in department records.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.609, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4.47, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.049, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.132. REPORTS TO EMPLOYER OR CLIENT. (a) A written report submitted to a company license holder's employer or client may only be submitted by the company license holder or a person authorized by a company license holder. The person submitting the report shall exercise diligence in determining whether the information in the report is correct.

(b) A company license holder or an officer, director, partner, or employee of a company license holder may not knowingly make a false report to the employer or client for whom information is obtained.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.050, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.133. CONFIDENTIALITY; INFORMATION RELATING TO CRIMINAL OFFENSE. (a) A company license holder or an officer, director, or partner of a company license holder may not disclose to another information obtained by the person for an employer or client except:

(1) at the direction of the employer or client; or

(2) as required by state law or court order.

(b) A company license holder or an officer, director, or partner of a company license holder shall disclose to a law enforcement officer or a district attorney, or that individual's representative, information the person obtains that relates to a criminal offense. A private investigator who is working under the direct supervision of a licensed attorney satisfies this requirement by disclosing the information to the supervising attorney.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 906 (H.B. 2833), Sec. 8, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.051, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.134. COMPANY LICENSE HOLDER EXEMPTIONS FROM CERTAIN LOCAL REGULATIONS. (a) A company license holder or an employee of a company license holder is not required to obtain an authorization, permit, franchise, or license from, pay another fee or franchise tax to, or post a bond in a municipality, county, or other political subdivision of this state to engage in business or perform a service authorized under this chapter.

(b) A municipality, county, or other political subdivision of this state may not require a payment for the use of municipal, county, or other public facilities in connection with a business or service provided by a company license holder, except that a municipality may impose and collect:

(1) a reasonable charge for the use of a central alarm installation located in a police office that is owned, operated, or monitored by the municipality; and

(2) reasonable inspection and reinspection fees in connection with a device that causes at least five false alarms in a 12-month period.

(c) A municipality may require, until the device is repaired to the satisfaction of the appropriate municipal official, discontinuation of service of an alarm signal device that, because of mechanical malfunction or faulty equipment, causes at least five false alarms in a 12-month period.

(d) For the purposes of Subsection (c), a false alarm caused by human error or an act of God is not considered a mechanical malfunction or faulty equipment.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.052, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.053, eff. September 1, 2019.

SUBCHAPTER G. SECURITY OFFICER COMMISSION REQUIREMENTS

Sec. 1702.161. SECURITY OFFICER COMMISSION REQUIRED. (a) An individual may not accept employment as a security officer to carry a firearm in the course and scope of the individual's duties unless the individual holds a security officer commission.

(b) An individual employed as a security officer may not knowingly carry a firearm during the course of performing duties as a security officer unless the department has issued a security officer commission to the individual.

(c) A person may not hire or employ an individual as a security officer to carry a firearm in the course and scope of the individual's duties unless the individual holds a security officer commission.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.610, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4.48, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.054, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.162. EMPLOYER'S APPLICATION FOR SECURITY OFFICER COMMISSION. The employer of a security officer who applies for a security officer commission for the officer must submit an application to the department on a form provided by the department.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.611, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4.49, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.055, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.163. QUALIFICATIONS FOR SECURITY OFFICER COMMISSION. (a) An applicant employed by a company license holder is not eligible for a security officer commission unless the applicant submits as part of the application satisfactory evidence that the applicant has:

(1) completed the basic training course at a school or under an instructor approved by the department;

(2) met each qualification established by this chapter and administrative rule;

(3) achieved the score required by the department on the examination under Section 1702.1685;

(4) demonstrated to the satisfaction of the firearm training instructor that the applicant has complied with other department standards for minimum marksmanship competency with a handgun; and

(5) provided proof of completion by and the results of the Minnesota Multiphasic Personality Inventory test for the applicant.

(b) An individual is not eligible for a security officer commission if the individual:

(1) is disqualified by state or federal law from owning or possessing a firearm;

(2) is incapable of exercising sound judgment in the proper use and storage of a handgun;

(3) is a fugitive from justice for a felony or a Class A or Class B misdemeanor;

(4) is a chemically dependent person; or

(5) is currently restricted under a court protective order or subject to a restraining order affecting the spousal relationship, other than a restraining order solely affecting property interests.

(c) An individual who has been convicted twice in the 10-year period preceding the date on which the person applies for a security officer commission of an offense of the grade of Class B misdemeanor or greater that involves the use of alcohol or a controlled substance as a statutory element of the offense is a chemically dependent person for purposes of this section and is not qualified to receive a security officer commission under this subchapter. This subsection does not preclude the disqualification of an individual for being a chemically dependent person if other evidence exists to demonstrate that the person is a chemically dependent person.

(d) For purposes of Subsection (b)(2), a person is incapable of exercising sound judgment with respect to the proper use and storage of a handgun if the person:

(1) has been diagnosed by a licensed physician as suffering from a psychiatric disorder or condition that causes or is likely to cause substantial impairment in judgment, mood, perception, impulse control, or intellectual ability;

(2) suffers from a psychiatric disorder or condition described by Subdivision (1) that:

(A) is in remission but is reasonably likely to redevelop at a future time; or

(B) requires continuous medical treatment to avoid redevelopment;

(3) has been diagnosed by a licensed physician or declared by a court as incompetent to manage the person's own affairs; or

(4) has entered a plea of not guilty by reason of insanity in a criminal proceeding.

(d-1) For the purposes of determining eligibility under Subsection (b)(2), the department may require the applicant to authorize the release to the department of any relevant medical records.

(e) The following constitutes evidence that a person has a psychiatric disorder or condition described by Subsection (d)(1):

(1) involuntary psychiatric hospitalization in the five years preceding the date of the application;

(2) psychiatric hospitalization in the two years preceding the date of the application;

(3) inpatient or residential substance abuse treatment in the five years preceding the date of the application;

(4) diagnosis in the five years preceding the date of the application by a licensed physician that the person is dependent on alcohol, a controlled substance, or a similar substance; or

(5) diagnosis at any time by a licensed physician that the person suffers or has suffered from a psychiatric disorder or condition consisting of or relating to:

(A) schizophrenia or delusional disorder;

(B) bipolar disorder;

(C) chronic dementia, whether caused by illness, brain defect, or brain injury;

(D) dissociative identity disorder;

(E) intermittent explosive disorder; or

(F) antisocial personality disorder.

(f) Notwithstanding Subsection (d), a person who has previously been diagnosed as suffering from a psychiatric disorder or condition described by Subsection (d) or listed in Subsection (e) is not because of that disorder or condition incapable of exercising sound judgment with respect to the proper use and storage of a handgun if the person provides the department with a certificate from a licensed physician whose primary practice is in the field of psychiatry stating that the psychiatric disorder or condition is in remission and is not reasonably likely to develop at a future time.

(g) An individual's eligibility under this section is not affected by a relationship or lack of relationship between the nature of a criminal charge or conviction and the regulated occupation.

(h) The commission by rule shall require an applicant for a security officer commission to complete the Minnesota Multiphasic Personality Inventory test. The department may use the results of the test to evaluate the applicant's psychological fitness.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.612, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1035 (H.B. 1132), Sec. 1.01, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1278 (H.B. 2303), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 906 (H.B. 2833), Sec. 9, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4B.10, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.056, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1015 (H.B. 3424), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 1702.165. ISSUANCE OF SECURITY OFFICER COMMISSION; POCKET CARD. (a) The department:

(1) may issue a security officer commission to an individual employed as a uniformed security officer; and

(2) shall issue a security officer commission to a qualified employee of an armored car company that is a carrier conducting the armored car business under a federal or state permit or certificate.

(b) A security officer commission issued under this section must be in the form of a pocket card designed by the department that identifies the security officer.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.614, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4.50, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.057, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.167. TERMINATION OF EMPLOYMENT AS COMMISSIONED SECURITY OFFICER; TRANSFER OF COMMISSION. The holder of a security officer commission who terminates employment with one employer may transfer the individual's commission to a new employer if, not later than the 14th day after the date the individual begins the new employment, the new employer notifies the department of the transfer of employment on a form prescribed by the department, accompanied by payment of the employee information update fee.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.616(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4.51, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.058, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.1675. TRAINING PROGRAMS. (a) The commission shall establish a basic training course for commissioned security officers. The course must include, at a minimum:

(1) general security officer training issues;

(2) classroom instruction on handgun proficiency and self-defense tactics; and

(3) range instruction on handgun proficiency.

(b) The course must be offered and taught by schools and instructors approved by the department. To receive department approval, a school or an instructor must submit an application to the department on a form provided by the department.

(c) The basic training course established under this section must consist of a minimum of 30 hours.

(d) The general security officer training portion of the course must include instruction on:

(1) applicable rules and state laws;

(2) field note taking and report writing; and

(3) any other topics of security officer training curriculum the department considers necessary.

(e) The department shall develop a commissioned security officer training manual that contains applicable state laws and rules to be used in the instruction and training of commissioned security officers.

(f) The commission shall adopt rules necessary to administer the provisions of this section concerning the training requirements of this chapter.

(g) The handgun proficiency and self-defense course must include at least 10 hours and not more than 15 hours of in-person instruction with an on-site instructor approved by the department on:

(1) the laws that relate to weapons and to the use of deadly force;

(2) handgun use, proficiency, and safety;

(3) nonviolent dispute resolution;

(4) proper storage practices for handguns, with an emphasis on storage practices that eliminate the possibility of accidental injury to a child; and

(5) self-defense tactics.

(h) The range instruction on handgun proficiency must include an actual demonstration by the applicant of the applicant's ability to safely and proficiently use a handgun. The applicant must demonstrate, at a minimum, the degree of proficiency that is required to effectively operate a 9-millimeter or .38-caliber handgun.

(i) The commission by rule shall establish minimum standards for handgun proficiency that are at least as stringent as the standards for handgun proficiency developed under Section 411.188, Government Code.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.617, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4.52, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.059, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1015 (H.B. 3424), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 1702.168. FIREARM REQUIREMENTS. (a) In addition to the requirements of Section 1702.163(a), the commission by rule shall establish other qualifications for individuals who are employed in positions requiring the carrying of firearms. The qualifications may include:

(1) physical and mental standards; and

(2) other requirements that relate to the competency and reliability of individuals to carry firearms.

(b) The commission shall prescribe appropriate forms and adopt rules by which evidence is presented that the requirements are fulfilled.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.618, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4.53, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.060, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.1685. HANDGUN PROFICIENCY EXAMINATION. (a) The proficiency examination required to obtain or renew a security officer commission must include:

(1) a written section on the subjects listed in Sections 1702.1675(g)(1)-(4); and

(2) a physical demonstration of handgun proficiency that meets the minimum standards established under Section 1702.1675(h) or (i).

(b) Only a department-approved instructor may administer the handgun proficiency examination.

(c) An applicant for a security officer commission must demonstrate the required proficiency within the 90-day period before the date the security officer commission is issued.

(d) The school shall maintain the records of the required proficiency and make the records available for inspection by the department.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.619, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4.54, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.061, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1015 (H.B. 3424), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 1702.169. FIREARM RESTRICTIONS. A commissioned security officer other than a person acting as a personal protection officer may not carry a firearm unless:

(1) the security officer is:

(A) engaged in the performance of duties as a security officer; or

(B) traveling to or from the place of assignment;

(2) the security officer wears a distinctive uniform indicating that the individual is a security officer; and

(3) the firearm is in plain view.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1048 (H.B. 2101), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 1702.170. NONAPPLICABILITY OF FIREARM RESTRICTIONS. Sections 1702.161, 1702.169, and 1702.206 do not apply to the holder of a temporary security officer commission who:

(1) is in uniform;

(2) possesses only one firearm; and

(3) is performing the individual's duties.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 1702.171. SECURITY OFFICER COMMISSION RECORDS. The commission shall adopt rules for the maintenance of records relating to an individual to whom the department has issued a security officer commission.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.620, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4.55, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.062, eff. September 1, 2019.

SUBCHAPTER H. EMPLOYMENT OF COMMISSIONED SECURITY OFFICER BY CERTAIN PERSONS; REQUIREMENTS

Sec. 1702.181. NOTICE AND REGISTRATION REQUIRED; REGISTRY. (a) The security department of a private business or a political subdivision may not employ a commissioned security officer unless the security department provides notice to the department in the form prescribed by the commission of:

(1) the security department's intent to employ a commissioned security officer and register with the department under this section;

(2) the name, title, and contact information of the person serving in the security department as the contact for the department; and

(3) any change in the information provided in Subdivision (1) or (2).

(b) The department shall maintain a registry of security departments that provide notice under Subsection (a) and the name, title, and contact information of the person serving as contact for each security department.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.064, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.182. SECURITY DEPARTMENT OF PRIVATE BUSINESS. (a) A security department acts as the security department of a private business if it:

(1) has as its general purpose the protection and security of its own property and grounds; and

(2) does not offer or provide security services to another person.

(b) For purposes of this subchapter, a hospital licensed under Chapter 241 or 577, Health and Safety Code, may provide security services to:

(1) buildings, grounds, and tenants located on the hospital's property or campus, regardless of who owns the building; and

(2) a parent entity or member entity of the hospital or hospital corporation, or an affiliated entity or business with whom the hospital shares common ownership or control.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1278 (H.B. 2303), Sec. 5, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 1702.184. LOCAL REGULATION OF CERTAIN SECURITY SERVICES FOR PRIVATE BUSINESSES. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b), a political subdivision of this state may not require a private business to contract with or employ a peace officer to provide security services for the business.

(b) This section does not apply to:

(1) a requirement that a private business contract with or employ a peace officer to:

(A) provide security services for a public event;

(B) provide security services for a private event held at a public facility that is owned or leased by a political subdivision of this state;

(C) conduct a public escort; or

(D) direct traffic on a public roadway; or

(2) an order or determination made by a court under Chapter 125, Civil Practice and Remedies Code.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 408 (S.B. 949), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.

SUBCHAPTER I. PERSONAL PROTECTION OFFICER LICENSE REQUIREMENTS

Sec. 1702.201. PERSONAL PROTECTION OFFICER LICENSE REQUIRED. An individual may not act as a personal protection officer unless the individual holds a personal protection officer license.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4B.11, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.066, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.202. PERSONAL PROTECTION OFFICER. An individual acts as a personal protection officer if the individual, while carrying a firearm, provides to another individual personal protection from bodily harm.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4B.12, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 1702.203. APPLICATION FOR PERSONAL PROTECTION OFFICER LICENSE. An applicant for a personal protection officer license must submit a written application on a form prescribed by the commission.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.622, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4.58, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.067, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.204. PERSONAL PROTECTION OFFICER LICENSE; QUALIFICATIONS. (a) An applicant for a personal protection officer license must be at least 21 years of age and must provide:

(1) a certificate of completion of the basic security officer training course;

(2) proof that the applicant:

(A) has been issued a security officer commission;

(B) is employed at the time of application by an investigations company or guard company licensed by the department; and

(C) has completed the required training in nonlethal self-defense or defense of a third person; and

(3) proof of completion and the results of the Minnesota Multiphasic Personality Inventory psychological testing.

(b) The commission by rule shall require an applicant for a personal protection officer license to complete the Minnesota Multiphasic Personality Inventory test. The department may use the results of the test to evaluate the applicant's psychological fitness.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.623, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4.59, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.068, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.205. PERSONAL PROTECTION OFFICER TRAINING. (a) The commission shall establish a 15-hour course for a personal protection officer consisting of training in nonlethal self-defense or defense of a third person.

(b) The training required by this section:

(1) must be provided in-person; and

(2) is in addition to the basic training course for security officers.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.624, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4.60, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.069, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1015 (H.B. 3424), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 1702.206. LIMITED AUTHORITY TO CARRY FIREARMS. (a) An individual acting as a personal protection officer may not carry a firearm unless the officer:

(1) is either:

(A) engaged in the exclusive performance of the officer's duties as a personal protection officer for the employer under whom the officer's personal protection officer license is issued; or

(B) traveling to or from the officer's place of assignment; and

(2) carries the officer's security officer commission and personal protection officer license on the officer's person while performing the officer's duties or traveling as described by Subdivision (1) and presents the commission and license on request.

(b) An individual who is acting as a personal protection officer and is wearing the uniform of a security officer, including any uniform or apparel described by Section 1702.323(d), may not conceal any firearm the individual is carrying and shall carry the firearm in plain view. An individual who is acting as a personal protection officer and is not wearing the uniform of a security officer shall conceal the firearm, regardless of whether the individual is authorized to openly carry the firearm under any other law.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1048 (H.B. 2101), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4B.13, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 437 (H.B. 910), Sec. 37, eff. January 1, 2016.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.070, eff. September 1, 2019.

SUBCHAPTER J. LICENSING AND DUTIES OF INDIVIDUALS

Sec. 1702.221. INDIVIDUAL LICENSE REQUIRED. (a) To perform any activity regulated by this chapter, the individual must:

(1) obtain the proper individual license under Subsection (b); and

(2) be employed by a company license holder.

(b) An individual must obtain the appropriate individual license in accordance with the requirements of this chapter and related administrative rules if the individual:

(1) is employed as:

(A) an alarm instructor;

(B) an alarm systems installer;

(C) an alarm systems monitor;

(D) an electronic access control device installer;

(E) a level 3 classroom or firearm instructor;

(F) a locksmith;

(G) a noncommissioned security officer;

(H) a level 4 personal protection instructor;

(I) a private investigator; or

(J) an individual whose duties include performing another activity for which an individual license is required under Subsection (e); or

(2) is an owner who owns at least a 51 percent interest in a company license holder.

(c) Licensure under this chapter does not preclude an individual from performing additional duties or services authorized by the individual's employer that are not regulated by this chapter. An individual who performs more than one of the services that require an individual license under this section must obtain an individual license for each service.

(d) In addition to the services listed in Subsection (b), a person holding a security officer commission must also obtain an individual license for personal protection if the individual performs the services described by Section 1702.202.

(e) The commission by rule may require a person to hold an individual license for performing any other activity expressly regulated by this chapter.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.625, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 936, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 906 (H.B. 2833), Sec. 10, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4.61, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.072, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.222. SECURITY OFFICER. An individual acts as a security officer for purposes of this chapter if the individual is:

(1) employed by a security services contractor or the security department of a private business; and

(2) employed to perform the duties of an alarm systems response runner who responds to the first signal of entry, a security guard, security watchman, security patrolman, armored car guard, or courier guard.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 1702.2226. ELECTRONIC ACCESS CONTROL DEVICE INSTALLER. (a) An individual acts as an electronic access control device installer for purposes of this chapter if the individual installs, maintains, or repairs an electronic access control device.

(b) A person licensed as an electronic access control device installer may not install alarm systems unless the person holds an individual license under this chapter as an alarm systems installer.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 936, Sec. 9, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4.62, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.073, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.2227. LOCKSMITH. (a) An individual acts as a locksmith for the purposes of this chapter if the person:

(1) sells, installs, services, or maintains mechanical security devices, including deadbolts and locks; or

(2) advertises or offers services to the public or represents to the public that the person is a locksmith.

(b) This section does not apply to a hotel, as that term is defined by Section 156.001, Tax Code.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 936, Sec. 9, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1102 (H.B. 2243), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 1702.223. ALARM SYSTEMS INSTALLER. (a) An individual acts as an alarm systems installer for purposes of this chapter if the individual installs, maintains, or repairs an alarm system or detection device.

(b) An alarm systems installer may sell, install, maintain, repair, or service an electronic access control device or a mechanical security device that is capable of activation through a wireless signal. An alarm systems installer may not rekey an electronic access control device or mechanical security device that can be activated by a key. This subsection does not apply to a mechanical security device or electronic access control device installed in a motor vehicle.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 936, Sec. 11, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1084 (H.B. 3433), Sec. 7, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 1702.224. ALARM SYSTEMS MONITOR. (a) An individual acts as an alarm systems monitor for purposes of this chapter if the individual monitors an alarm system or detection device.

(b) This section does not apply to an individual employed exclusively and regularly by an employer, other than a license holder, in connection with the affairs of that employer and with whom the individual has an employee-employer relationship.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 1702.229. QUALIFICATIONS FOR INDIVIDUAL LICENSE. (a) An applicant for an individual license must meet the qualifications required under Section 1702.113 for a company license applicant.

(b) The commission by rule may adopt additional qualifications for an individual to obtain an individual license under this subchapter.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.628, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 906 (H.B. 2833), Sec. 12, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.074, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.230. APPLICATION FOR INDIVIDUAL LICENSE. (a) An application for an individual license must be verified and include:

(1) the applicant's full name, residence address, residence telephone number, date and place of birth, and social security number;

(2) a statement that:

(A) lists each name used by the applicant, other than the name by which the applicant is known at the time of application, and an explanation stating each place where each name was used, the date of each use, and a full explanation of the reasons the name was used; or

(B) states that the applicant has never used a name other than the name by which the applicant is known at the time of application;

(3) the name and address of the applicant's employer;

(4) the date the employment described by Subdivision (3) commenced;

(5) a letter from the company license holder requesting that the applicant be issued an individual license;

(6) the title of the position occupied by the applicant and a description of the applicant's duties;

(7) the required fees, including the criminal history check fee established under Section 1702.282;

(8) fingerprints of the applicant provided in the manner prescribed by the department; and

(9) any other information, evidence, statement, or document required by the department.

(b) The employer of the applicant shall make a reasonable attempt to verify the information required under Subsection (a)(1) before the earlier of:

(1) the date the application is submitted; or

(2) the date the applicant begins to perform the duties of employment that require an individual license.

(c) An applicant must submit an application that substantially meets the requirements of this section before employment in a capacity for which an individual license is required.

(d) For purposes of Subsection (a), an application is not considered to be verified until the department has received electronic verification from the department or the Federal Bureau of Investigation, as applicable, that the applicant has submitted the applicant's fingerprints.

(e) The department shall make information available to the public concerning whether an applicant for an individual license has met the requirements under this chapter for performing a service for which the individual license is required.

(f) If information concerning an applicant is not made available under Subsection (e) before the 48th hour after the time the applicant's fingerprints are submitted in accordance with Subsection (a), the applicant may begin performing the duties of employment for which the individual license is required, other than duties as a commissioned security officer, if the employer or its agent:

(1) verifies through the department's publicly accessible website that the applicant is:

(A) not disqualified for the individual license based on the applicant's criminal history; and

(B) not required to register as a sex offender under Chapter 62, Code of Criminal Procedure; and

(2) maintains in the applicant's employee file a copy of the search results obtained under Subdivision (1).

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.629, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4.66, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4B.14, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 827 (H.B. 4030), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.075, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.2305. PROVISIONAL INDIVIDUAL LICENSE. (a) The department may issue a provisional individual license to an applicant currently licensed in another jurisdiction who seeks an equivalent license in this state and who:

(1) has been licensed in good standing in the field in which the individual license is sought for at least two years in another jurisdiction, including a foreign country, that has licensing requirements substantially equivalent to the requirements of this chapter;

(2) has passed a national or other examination recognized by the commission relating to practice in the field in which the individual license is sought; and

(3) is employed by a company license holder with whom the provisional individual license holder will practice during the time the person holds a provisional individual license.

(b) A provisional individual license is valid until the date the department approves or denies the provisional individual license holder's application for an individual license. The department shall issue an individual license under this chapter to the provisional individual license holder if the provisional individual license holder is eligible to be licensed under this chapter.

(c) The department must approve or deny a provisional individual license holder's application for an individual license not later than the 180th day after the date the provisional individual license is issued. The department may extend the 180-day period if the results of an examination have not been received by the department before the end of that period.

(d) The commission may establish a fee for a provisional individual license in an amount reasonable and necessary to cover the cost of issuing the individual license.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.630(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4.67, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.076, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.232. POCKET CARDS. (a) The department shall issue a pocket card for each individual license holder under this chapter. A pocket card for an owner of a company license holder shall be issued to the company license holder.

(b) The department shall determine the size, design, and content of the pocket card.

(c) The pocket card must:

(1) state the name of the individual license holder;

(2) contain a photograph, affixed to the pocket card by the department at the time the card is issued, and the signature of the individual license holder; and

(3) state the date the card was issued and the card's expiration date.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.632, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4.68, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.077, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 918 (H.B. 4195), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.233. DURATION OF POCKET CARDS. A pocket card issued for an individual license holder expires on the date the individual license expires under Section 1702.301(b).

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.633, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.078, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.234. TRANSFER OF INDIVIDUAL LICENSE. An individual license holder may transfer the holder's license from one employer to another employer if, not later than the 14th day after the date the individual license holder begins the new employment, the new employer notifies the department of the transfer of employment on a form prescribed by the commission accompanied by payment of the employee information update fee.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.634(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4.69, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.079, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.235. PREEMPLOYMENT CHECK FOR NONCOMMISSIONED SECURITY OFFICERS. A person may not hire a noncommissioned security officer unless the person conducts a preemployment check as required by commission rule.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.635, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4.70, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.080, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.236. EXAMINATION AND TRAINING REQUIREMENTS FOR ELECTRONIC ACCESS CONTROL DEVICE INSTALLERS. (a) The department shall require an individual who applies for an individual license as an electronic access control device installer to pass an examination given by the department or a person approved by the department. The examination must cover material related to access control.

(b) The commission by rule may allow an electronic access control device installer to obtain or renew an individual license by fulfilling the requirements of a commission-approved, industry-based educational training program.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 936, Sec. 10, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4.71, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.081, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.239. TRAINING REQUIREMENTS FOR ALARM SYSTEMS INSTALLER; EXAMINATION. (a) The commission may require that an individual employed as an alarm systems installer hold a certification by a commission-approved training program to renew an individual license. The commission may approve only nationally recognized training programs that consist of at least 16 hours of classroom study in the areas of work allowed by the individual license. To be approved, a training program must offer at least two certification programs each year, sufficient to complete the requirements of this subsection, within 100 miles of each county in the state that has a population of more than 500,000.

(b) The commission may require an individual who has completed a training program under Subsection (a) to pass an examination given by the department or by a person approved by the department. The commission may approve examinations in conjunction with training programs approved under Subsection (a). The individual's performance on the examination must demonstrate the individual's qualifications to perform the duties allowed by the individual's individual license.

(c) If the commission requires certification or examination under this section, the commission shall adopt rules to require that to renew an individual license, an individual who is employed as an alarm systems installer and who has already once renewed the individual license must obtain continuing education credits related to the line of work for which the individual is licensed. If the commission requires the continuing education, the chief administrator must approve classes offered by nationally recognized organizations, and participants in the classes must qualify according to commission rules.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.639, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 936, Sec. 12, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4.72, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.082, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.240. EXEMPTIONS FOR UNDERCOVER AGENT. (a) For the purposes of this section, "undercover agent" means an individual hired by a person to perform a job in or for that person, and while performing that job, to act as an undercover agent, an employee, or an independent contractor of a company license holder, but supervised by a company license holder.

(b) An employee of a company license holder who is employed exclusively as an undercover agent is not required to obtain an individual license.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.640, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4.73, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.083, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.241. JURISPRUDENCE EXAMINATION. (a) The commission may develop and the department may administer at least twice each calendar year a jurisprudence examination to determine the knowledge that an applicant for an individual license has of this chapter, commission rules, and any other applicable laws of this state affecting the applicant's activities regulated under this chapter.

(b) Before the department may administer a jurisprudence examination under this section, the commission shall adopt rules to implement this section, including rules related to the development and administration of the examination, examination fees, guidelines for reexamination, grading the examination, and providing notice of examination results. The department may design different examinations for different types of individual licenses.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4.74, eff. September 1, 2009.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.084, eff. September 1, 2019.

SUBCHAPTER L. GENERAL PROVISIONS APPLICABLE TO REGULATED PERSONS

Sec. 1702.282. CRIMINAL HISTORY CHECK. (a) The department shall conduct a criminal history check, including a check of any criminal history record information maintained by the Federal Bureau of Investigation, in the manner provided by Subchapter F, Chapter 411, Government Code, on each applicant for a license or security officer commission issued under this chapter. As part of its criminal history check, the department may request that the applicant provide certified copies of relevant court documents or other records. The failure to provide the requested records within a reasonable time as determined by the department may result in the application being considered incomplete. An applicant is not eligible for a license or security officer commission issued under this chapter if the check reveals that the applicant has committed an act that constitutes grounds for the denial of the license or commission. Except as provided by Subsection (d), each applicant shall submit at the time of application, including an application for the renewal of a license or security officer commission issued under this chapter, fingerprints in the manner prescribed by the department accompanied by the fee set by the commission.

(b) Before beginning employment as a commissioned security officer, the applicant must be approved by the department based on the results of the check under Subsection (a). To continue employment in a capacity regulated under this chapter other than as a commissioned security officer, the applicant must be approved by the department based on the results of the check under Subsection (a) not later than the 120th day after the date the applicant begins employment in that capacity.

(c) A license or security officer commission issued by the department is conditional on the department's review of criminal history record information.

(d) An applicant who is a peace officer is not required to submit fingerprints with the applicant's application. On request, the law enforcement agency or other entity that employs the peace officer or the entity that maintains the peace officer's fingerprints shall provide the fingerprints for the peace officer to the department. The applicant shall provide sufficient information to the department to enable the department to obtain the fingerprints under this subsection.

(e) On receipt of notice that a check of the applicant's criminal record has uncovered an unresolved and potentially disqualifying arrest that occurred before the 10th anniversary of the date the application is filed, the applicant must provide a letter of reference from the county sheriff, prosecuting attorney, or judge of the county in which the applicant was arrested stating that a record of a disposition related to the arrest does not exist, and to the best of the county sheriff's, prosecuting attorney's, or judge's knowledge the applicant is free of any disqualifying convictions. If the applicant fails to provide either the letter of reference or documentary proof of the final disposition of the arrest, the application is considered incomplete and the applicant may not be issued a license or security officer commission under this chapter.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.645(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1035 (H.B. 1132), Sec. 1.02, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1278 (H.B. 2303), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 906 (H.B. 2833), Sec. 13, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4.75, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4B.15, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1084 (H.B. 3433), Sec. 8, eff. June 14, 2013.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.085, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.283. CRUELTY TO ANIMALS. A person who has been convicted of cruelty to animals under Section 42.09 or 42.092, Penal Code, may not be employed to work with dogs as a security officer by a security services contractor or security department of a private business that uses dogs to protect individuals or property or to conduct investigations.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 886 (H.B. 2328), Sec. 6, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4.76, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.086, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.284. ALARM SYSTEMS RECORDS CONFIDENTIAL. (a) Information contained in alarm systems records maintained by a governmental body that concerns the location of an alarm system, the name of the occupant of an alarm system location, or the type of alarm system used is confidential and may be disclosed only to the department, to the alarm company to which the confidential records relate, or as otherwise required by state law or court order.

(b) Information described by Subsection (a) may be used by the governmental body to inform the occupant of:

(1) the governmental body's alarm system response policy and any proposed change to that policy; and

(2) the option of the occupant to contract with a security services provider to respond to the occupant's alarm.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.646, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 232 (H.B. 1784), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 906 (H.B. 2833), Sec. 14, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.087, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.285. FALSE REPRESENTATION. A person may not represent falsely that the person:

(1) is employed by a company license holder; or

(2) has a license or security officer commission under this chapter.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4.77, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.088, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.286. DUTIES OF ALARM SYSTEMS COMPANY. (a) On the installation or activation of an alarm system, an alarm systems company shall distribute to the occupant of the alarm system location information summarizing:

(1) the applicable law relating to false alarms, including the potential for penalties and revocation or suspension of a permit;

(2) how to prevent false alarms; and

(3) how to operate the alarm system.

(b) An alarm systems company shall notify the municipality in which the alarm system is located of an installation or activation of an alarm system not later than the 30th day after the date of the installation or activation. The alarm systems company shall provide to the municipality:

(1) the alarm systems company name;

(2) the alarm systems company license number;

(3) the name of the occupant of the alarm system location;

(4) the address of the alarm system location; and

(5) the date of installation or activation.

(c) Information provided to a governmental body under this section is confidential and subject to disclosure only as provided under Section 1702.284.

(d) An alarm systems company commits an offense if the company violates Subsection (a) or (b). An offense under this subsection is a Class C misdemeanor.

(e) The duties imposed by this section on an alarm systems company do not apply to the installation or activation of a personal emergency response system, as defined under Section 1702.331.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 808 (S.B. 568), Sec. 7, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 1702.2865. CUSTOMER AUTHORIZATION REQUIRED FOR CERTAIN LOCKSMITH SERVICES. (a) A locksmith company or locksmith may not perform services for a customer who seeks entry to a structure, motor vehicle, or other property unless the customer, in the course of the transaction:

(1) shows the locksmith company or locksmith a government-issued identification; and

(2) provides a signed authorization stating that the customer owns or is otherwise entitled to legal access to the structure, motor vehicle, or other property.

(b) A locksmith company or locksmith is exempt from Subsection (a) if the locksmith is requested to perform services in a case of imminent threat to a person or property.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1102 (H.B. 2243), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2005.

Renumbered from Occupations Code, Section 1702.286 by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 87 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 27.001(73), eff. September 1, 2009.

Renumbered from Occupations Code, Section 1702.286 by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4B.16, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 1702.287. DETECTION DEVICE CONTROL PANELS; MINIMUM STANDARDS. An alarm systems company may not install any alarm system on or after January 1, 2007, that includes a detection device control panel unless the control panel meets or exceeds the standards of the American National Standards Institute for false alarm reduction.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 808 (S.B. 568), Sec. 7, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 1702.288. NOTICE OF CERTAIN INFORMATION TO RECIPIENT OF ALARM SYSTEM SERVICES. (a) The commission shall adopt rules in accordance with this section that require a company license holder acting as an alarm systems company under this chapter to inform each of the license holder's clients that the client is entitled to receive a written contract for alarm system services that contains the client's fee arrangement and other relevant information about services to be rendered.

(b) The rules shall require that a written contract for alarm system services shall be furnished to a client in accordance with Subsection (a) not later than the seventh day after the date the client requests the written contract.

(c) The rules shall require that the written contract for services shall be dated and signed by the owner or manager of an alarm systems company or a person expressly authorized by the owner or manager to sign written contracts on behalf of the company.

(d) The rules shall require that, not later than the seventh day after the date of entering into a contract for services regulated by the department with another alarm systems company or alarm systems monitor, an alarm systems company shall:

(1) notify the recipient of those services of the name, address, and telephone number and individual to contact at the company that purchased the contract;

(2) notify the recipient of services at the time the contract is negotiated that another licensed company may provide any of the services requested by subcontracting or outsourcing those services; and

(3) if any of the services are subcontracted or outsourced to a licensed third party, notify the recipient of services, by mail, of the name, address, phone number, and license number of the company providing those services.

(e) The rules shall require that notice provided to a recipient of services under Subsection (d) shall:

(1) be mailed to the recipient in a written form that emphasizes the required information; and

(2) include stickers or other materials to be affixed to an alarm system indicating the alarm systems company's or alarm systems monitor's new telephone number.

(f) A company license holder acting as an alarm systems company does not have to provide the notice required under Subsection (d) if the contact information, including the address and the telephone numbers for the alarm systems company, has not changed.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 808 (S.B. 568), Sec. 7, eff. September 1, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1084 (H.B. 3433), Sec. 9, eff. June 14, 2013.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.089, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.289. INSPECTIONS. (a) An employee or agent of the department who enters the place of business of a person regulated under this chapter for the purpose of conducting an inspection or audit must:

(1) notify the manager or owner of the business of the presence of the person conducting the inspection or audit; and

(2) present the manager or owner of the business with credentials that identify the person conducting the inspection or audit as an employee or agent of the department.

(b) This section does not prohibit the department from conducting an undercover investigation or covert audit in order to determine compliance with this chapter or a rule adopted under this chapter.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1084 (H.B. 3433), Sec. 10, eff. June 14, 2013.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.090, eff. September 1, 2019.

SUBCHAPTER M. EXPIRATION; RENEWAL

Sec. 1702.301. EXPIRATION. (a) Repealed by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.114(b)(32), eff. September 1, 2019.

(b) A company license, individual license, and security officer commission expire on the dates determined by the commission under Section 411.511, Government Code, but not later than the second anniversary of the date the license or commission is issued.

(c) A personal protection officer license expires on the date determined by the commission under Section 411.511, Government Code, but not later than the expiration date of the security officer commission under which the license is issued.

(d) Repealed by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.114(b)(32), eff. September 1, 2019.

(e) Repealed by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.114(b)(32), eff. September 1, 2019.

(f) Repealed by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.114(b)(32), eff. September 1, 2019.

(g) Repealed by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.114(b)(32), eff. September 1, 2019.

(h) A license issued under this chapter, other than one specified in this section, expires on the date determined by the commission under Section 411.511, Government Code, but not later than the second anniversary of the date the license is issued.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.647(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4.78, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.091, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.114(b)(32), eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.302. LICENSE RENEWAL. (a) A person who is otherwise eligible to renew a license may renew an unexpired license by paying the required renewal fee to the department before the expiration date of the license. A person whose license has expired may not engage in activities that require a license until the license has been renewed.

(b) A person whose license has been expired for 90 days or less may renew the license by paying to the department a renewal fee that is equal to 1-1/2 times the normally required renewal fee.

(c) A person whose license has been expired for longer than 90 days but less than one year may renew the license by paying to the department a renewal fee that is equal to two times the normally required renewal fee.

(d) A person whose license has been expired for one year or more may not renew the license. The person may obtain a new license by complying with the requirements and procedures, including the examination requirements, for obtaining an original license.

(e) Not later than the 30th day before the date a person's license is scheduled to expire, the department shall send written notice of the impending expiration to the person at the person's last known address according to the department's records.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.648, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4.79, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.092, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.303. RENEWAL OF EXPIRED LICENSE BY OUT-OF-STATE PRACTITIONER. A person who was licensed in this state, moved to another state, and is currently licensed and has been in practice in the other state for the two years preceding the date the person applies for renewal may obtain a new license without reexamination. The person must pay to the department a fee that is equal to two times the normally required renewal fee for the license.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.649(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4.80, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.093, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.305. EFFECT OF LICENSE RENEWAL ON DISCIPLINARY ACTION. Renewal of a license does not prohibit the bringing of disciplinary proceedings for an act committed before the effective date of the renewal.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 1702.306. EFFECT OF SUSPENSION ON LICENSE RENEWAL REQUIREMENTS. A suspended license expires on the license's expiration date and may be renewed as provided by this chapter, but the renewal does not entitle the license holder, while the license remains suspended and until the license is reinstated, to engage in the licensed activity or in conduct in violation of the order or judgment by which the license was suspended.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 1702.308. CONTINUING EDUCATION. (a) This section does not apply to a noncommissioned security officer.

(b) The department shall recognize, prepare, or administer continuing education programs for company license holders, commissioned security officers, and individual license holders. The commission shall set the minimum number of hours that must be completed and the types of programs that may be offered.

(c) A company license holder, commissioned security officer, or individual license holder must participate in the programs to the extent required by the commission to keep the person's license or commission. A company license holder, commissioned security officer, or individual license holder shall submit evidence of compliance with the commission's continuing education requirements in a manner prescribed by the department.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.652(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4.83, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.094, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.309. SECURITY OFFICER COMMISSION RENEWAL. (a) The commission by rule shall develop a continuing education course required for renewal of a security officer commission. Only a department-approved instructor may administer the continuing education course. The course must include at least six hours of instruction determined by the department.

(b) A commissioned security officer must demonstrate the proficiency required under Section 1702.1685 within the 90-day period before the date the commission is renewed.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.652(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2001. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 593, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4.84, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.095, eff. September 1, 2019.

SUBCHAPTER N. EXCEPTIONS

Sec. 1702.321. GOVERNMENT EMPLOYEES. (a) Except as provided by this section, this chapter does not apply to an officer or employee of the United States, this state, or a political subdivision of this state while the employee or officer is performing official duties.

(b) The provisions of this chapter relating to security officer commissions apply to a person employed by a political subdivision whose duties include serving as a security guard, security watchman, or security patrolman on property owned or operated by the political subdivision if the governing body of the political subdivision files a written request with the department for the department to issue a commission to the political subdivision's employees with those duties.

(c) The department may not charge a fee for issuing a commission to an officer under Subsection (b). The department shall issue to the officer a pocket card designating the political subdivision that employs the officer.

(d) The commission expires at the time the officer's employment as a security officer by the political subdivision is terminated.

(e) The department may approve a security officer training program conducted by the political subdivision in accordance with Sections 1702.1675 and 1702.168.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.653, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4.85, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.096, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.322. LAW ENFORCEMENT PERSONNEL. This chapter does not apply to:

(1) a person who has full-time employment as a peace officer and who receives compensation for private employment on an individual or an independent contractor basis as a patrolman, guard, extra job coordinator, or watchman if the officer:

(A) is employed in an employee-employer relationship or employed on an individual contractual basis:

(i) directly by the recipient of the services; or

(ii) by a company licensed under this chapter;

(B) is not in the employ of another peace officer;

(C) is not a reserve peace officer; and

(D) works as a peace officer on the average of at least 32 hours a week, is compensated by the state or a political subdivision of the state at least at the minimum wage, and is entitled to all employee benefits offered to a peace officer by the state or political subdivision;

(2) a reserve peace officer while the reserve officer is performing guard, patrolman, or watchman duties for a county and is being compensated solely by that county;

(3) a peace officer acting in an official capacity in responding to a burglar alarm or detection device; or

(4) a person engaged in the business of electronic monitoring of an individual as a condition of that individual's community supervision, parole, mandatory supervision, or release on bail, if the person does not perform any other service that requires a license under this chapter.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.654, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4B.17, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1247 (S.B. 1600), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 1702.323. SECURITY DEPARTMENT OF PRIVATE BUSINESS. (a) Except as provided by Subsections (b) and (d), this chapter does not apply to an individual employed in an employee-employer relationship exclusively and regularly by one employer in connection with the affairs of the employer.

(b) An individual described by Subsection (a) who carries a firearm in the course of employment must obtain a private security officer commission under this chapter.

(c) The security department of a private business may not hire or employ an individual to perform a duty described by Section 1702.222 if the individual has been convicted of a crime that would otherwise preclude the individual from being licensed under this chapter. The private business shall maintain the individual's criminal history record on file at the business and shall make the record available for inspection by the department.

(c-1) Although the security department of a private business that hires or employs an individual as a private security officer to possess a firearm in the course and scope of the individual's duties is required to apply for a security officer commission for the individual under this chapter, the security department of a private business is not required to apply for any license under this chapter.

(d) This chapter applies to an individual described by Subsection (a) who in the course of employment:

(1) comes into contact with the public;

(2) wears:

(A) a uniform commonly associated with security personnel or law enforcement;

(B) any type of badge commonly associated with security personnel or law enforcement; or

(C) a patch or apparel containing the word "security" or a substantially similar word that is intended to or is likely to create the impression that the individual is performing security services; and

(3) performs a duty described by Section 1702.108 or 1702.222.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.655, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 593, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 65 (H.B. 1393), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 663 (H.B. 1241), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 906 (H.B. 2833), Sec. 15, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 87 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 17.003, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.097, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.324. CERTAIN OCCUPATIONS. (a) For the purposes of this section, "landman" means an individual who, in the course and scope of the individual's business:

(1) acquires, divests, or manages petroleum or mineral interests;

(2) performs title or contract functions related to the exploration, exploitation, or disposition of petroleum or mineral interests; or

(3) otherwise engages in land services as defined by Section 954.001.

(b) This chapter does not apply to:

(1) a manufacturer or a manufacturer's authorized distributor while selling equipment intended for resale;

(2) a person engaged exclusively in the business of obtaining and providing information to:

(A) determine creditworthiness;

(B) collect debts; or

(C) ascertain the reliability of information provided by an applicant for property, life, or disability insurance or an indemnity or surety bond;

(3) a person engaged exclusively in the business of repossessing property that is secured by a mortgage or other security interest;

(4) a person who is engaged in the business of psychological testing or other testing and interviewing services, including services to determine attitudes, honesty, intelligence, personality, and skills, for preemployment purposes;

(5) a person who:

(A) is engaged in obtaining information that is a public record under Chapter 552, Government Code, regardless of whether the person receives compensation;

(B) is not a full-time employee, as defined by Section 61.001, Labor Code, of a person licensed under this chapter; and

(C) does not perform any other act that requires a license under this chapter;

(6) a licensed engineer practicing engineering or directly supervising engineering practice under Chapter 1001, including forensic analysis, burglar alarm system engineering, and necessary data collection;

(7) an employee of a cattle association who inspects livestock brands under the authority granted to the cattle association by the Grain Inspection, Packers and Stockyards Administration of the United States Department of Agriculture;

(8) a landman performing activities in the course and scope of the landman's business;

(9) an attorney while engaged in the practice of law;

(10) a person who obtains a document for use in litigation under an authorization or subpoena issued for a written or oral deposition;

(11) an admitted insurer, insurance adjuster, agent, or insurance broker licensed by the state, performing duties in connection with insurance transacted by that person;

(12) a person who on the person's own property or on property owned or managed by the person's employer:

(A) installs, changes, or repairs a mechanical security device;

(B) repairs an electronic security device; or

(C) cuts or makes a key for a security device;

(13) security personnel, including security contract personnel, working at a commercial nuclear power plant licensed by the United States Nuclear Regulatory Commission;

(14) a person or firm licensed as an accountant or accounting firm under Chapter 901, an owner of an accounting firm, or an employee of an accountant or accounting firm while performing services regulated under Chapter 901;

(15) a retailer, wholesaler, or other person who sells mechanical security devices, including locks and deadbolts, but who does not:

(A) service mechanical security devices for the public outside of the person's premises; or

(B) claim to act as a locksmith;

(16) an employee while performing investigative services that would otherwise be subject to this chapter for an entity regulated by the:

(A) Texas Department of Insurance;

(B) Office of Thrift Supervision;

(C) Securities and Exchange Commission;

(D) Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation; or

(E) Financial Industry Regulatory Authority;

(17) a social worker who holds a license issued under Chapter 505 who is engaged in the practice of social work;

(18) persons licensed under Chapter 1101, an association thereof, their authorized agents, or a multiple listing service, engaged in the business of selling, maintaining, repairing, programming, or placing lockboxes used for accessing real property; or

(19) an automobile club that holds a certificate of authority under Chapter 722, Transportation Code, its subcontractor, or a business that provides similar services, that unlocks a vehicle at the request of the owner or operator of the vehicle and that does not otherwise perform a locksmith service.

(c) The exemptions provided by Subsection (b) apply only to a person described in that subsection while the person is performing services directly related to and dependent on the provision of the exempted service that does not otherwise require licensing under this chapter. The exemptions do not apply to activities or services that are independent of the service or profession that is the basis for the exemption.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.656, eff. Sept. 1, 2001; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 936, Sec. 13, eff. Sept. 1, 2003; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1237, Sec. 2, eff. June 20, 2003; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1276, Sec. 14A.801, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 518 (H.B. 808), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2005.

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1102 (H.B. 2243), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1155 (H.B. 3140), Sec. 2, eff. June 18, 2005.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 906 (H.B. 2833), Sec. 16, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4.86, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 509 (H.B. 1779), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1084 (H.B. 3433), Sec. 11, eff. June 14, 2013.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 197 (S.B. 604), Sec. 2, eff. May 24, 2023.

Sec. 1702.325. COMMON CARRIERS. This chapter does not apply to:

(1) a common carrier by rail engaged in interstate commerce, regulated by state and federal authorities, and transporting commodities essential to the national defense and to the general welfare and safety of the community; or

(2) an officer, employee, or agent of a common carrier, as defined by Section 153 of the federal Communications Act of 1934 (47 U.S.C. Section 153), and its subsequent amendments, while protecting the carrier or a user of the carrier's long-distance services from a fraudulent, unlawful, or abusive use of those long-distance services.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.657, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 1702.326. MEDICAL ALERT SERVICES. (a) This chapter does not apply to an entity that:

(1) provides medical alert services for persons who are sick or disabled;

(2) does not provide any other service that requires a license under this chapter; and

(3) is:

(A) a hospital or a wholly owned subsidiary or an affiliate of a hospital licensed under Chapter 241, Health and Safety Code; or

(B) a charitable or a nonprofit entity that provides the services in the manner required by Subsection (b) and that is exempt from the payment of federal income taxes under Section 501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 and its subsequent amendments by being listed as an exempt entity under Section 501(c)(3) of that code.

(b) A charitable or nonprofit entity that provides medical alert services must provide those services through a licensed person, licensed nurse, licensed physician assistant or by a hospital, subsidiary, or affiliate described by Subsection (a)(3)(A).

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 1702.327. NONPROFIT AND CIVIC ORGANIZATIONS. This chapter does not apply to:

(1) a nonprofit business or civic organization that:

(A) employs a peace officer who meets the qualifications of Section 1702.322(1) as a patrolman, guard, or watchman;

(B) provides the services of the peace officer only to:

(i) the organization's members; or

(ii) if the organization does not have members, the members of the communities served by the organization as described in the organization's articles of incorporation or other organizational documents;

(C) devotes the net receipts from all charges for the services exclusively to the cost of providing the services or to the costs of other services for the enhancement of the security or safety of:

(i) the organization's members; or

(ii) if the organization does not have members, the members of the communities served by the organization as described in the organization's articles of incorporation or other organizational documents; and

(D) does not perform any other service that requires a license under this chapter; or

(2) a charitable, nonprofit organization that maintains a system of records to aid in the location of missing children and that:

(A) is exempt from the payment of federal income taxes under Section 501(a) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 and its subsequent amendments by being listed as an exempt entity under Section 501(c)(3) of that code;

(B) exclusively provides services related to locating missing children; and

(C) does not perform any other service that requires a license under this chapter.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 1702.328. SECURITY SYSTEMS SALES AND INSTALLATION. This chapter does not apply to:

(1) a person who owns and installs a burglar detection or alarm device on the person's own property or, if the person does not charge for the device or the installation, installs the device for the protection of the person's personal property located on another person's property and does not, as a normal business practice, install the devices on the property of another;

(2) a person in the business of building construction that installs electrical wiring and devices that may include in part the installation of a burglar alarm or detection device if:

(A) the person is a party to a contract that provides that:

(i) the installation will be performed under the direct supervision of, and inspected and certified by, a person licensed to install and certify the alarm or detection device; and

(ii) the license holder assumes full responsibility for the installation of the alarm or detection device; and

(B) the person does not service or maintain alarm systems, electronic access control devices, locks, or detection devices;

(3) a person who sells or installs automobile burglar alarm devices and who does not perform any other act that requires a license under this chapter; or

(4) a person who sells exclusively by e-commerce, over the counter transactions, or mail order, alarm systems, electronic access control devices, locks, or detection devices.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 936, Sec. 14, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1155 (H.B. 3140), Sec. 3, eff. June 18, 2005.

Sec. 1702.329. FIRE ALARM AND DETECTION SALES AND INSTALLATION. This chapter does not apply to:

(1) a person whose activities are regulated under Article 5.43-2, Insurance Code, except to the extent those activities are specifically regulated under this chapter; or

(2) a person who holds a license or other credential issued by a municipality to practice as an electrician and who installs fire or smoke detectors only in single-family or multifamily residences.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 1702.330. SECURITY PERSONNEL OF PRIVATE INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION. This chapter does not apply to:

(1) a person who is employed full-time by and is commissioned as a campus security personnel employee by a private institution of higher education under Section 51.212, Education Code; or

(2) a peace officer commissioned by an incorporated municipality who is hired under Section 51.212, Education Code, on a regular basis by a private institution of higher education while that peace officer is operating within the scope of the peace officer's employment with the institution of higher education.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.658(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 1702.331. PERSONAL EMERGENCY RESPONSE SYSTEMS. (a) In this section, "personal emergency response system" means an alarm system that is:

(1) installed in the residence of a person;

(2) monitored by an alarm systems company;

(3) designed only to permit the person to signal the occurrence of a medical or personal emergency on the part of the person so that the company may dispatch appropriate aid; and

(4) not part of a combination of alarm systems that includes a burglar alarm or fire alarm.

(b) This chapter does not apply to:

(1) an alarm systems company that sells, installs, services, monitors, or responds to only personal emergency response systems;

(2) an alarm systems installer who installs, maintains, or repairs only personal emergency response systems; and

(3) an owner of an alarm systems company described by Subdivision (1).

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 808 (S.B. 568), Sec. 8, eff. September 1, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.098, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.332. TELEMATICS SERVICE PROVIDERS. (a) In this section, "telematics service" means:

(1) a service that:

(A) is provided to owners, operators, and occupants of consumer vehicles or commercial fleet vehicles through the remote access of in-vehicle data that may rely on global positioning system satellite data to fix the exact location of the vehicle, including:

(i) location-specific emergency and roadside vehicle breakdown assistance;

(ii) automatic collision notification;

(iii) real-time traffic and navigation information;

(iv) remote vehicle diagnostics; and

(v) stolen vehicle recovery;

(B) is enabled through the two-way communication of voice or data, often with an interactive voice response technology interface, between a service subscriber's vehicle and a telematics company's response center; and

(C) is provided to:

(i) enhance vehicle service, safety, and convenience while driving for vehicle owners;

(ii) enable automakers and automobile dealerships to achieve greater service and customer management efficiencies and to increase customer retention; and

(iii) enable fleet operators to remotely manage their vehicles and other mobile assets; and

(2) a related service provided to consumers, automakers, automobile dealerships, and commercial fleet operators by a telematics company as part of the emerging technology industry that delivers telematics services on a national basis to service subscribers.

(b) Except as otherwise provided by this section, this chapter does not apply to a person who provides a telematics service in this state.

(c) To qualify for the exemption provided by Subsection (b), a telematics service provider shall establish business practices and procedures that are at least as stringent as the guidelines established by the Association of Public Safety Communications Officials International regarding the communication of information from telematics service providers to public safety agencies.

(d) The commission may adopt rules necessary to carry out the purposes of this section, including rules to determine whether a telematics service provider is complying with Subsection (c).

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 207 (H.B. 1531), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Renumbered from Occupations Code, Section 1702.331 by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 17.001(59), eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.099, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.333. CERTAIN VOLUNTEERS. (a) In this section, "volunteer security services" means services or activities that are:

(1) regulated under this chapter; and

(2) provided without compensation or remuneration.

(b) This chapter does not apply to a person who is providing volunteer security services on:

(1) the premises of a church, synagogue, or other established place of religious worship; or

(2) premises where an event sponsored or sanctioned by a public primary or secondary school is taking place.

(c) Except as provided by Subsection (d), while providing volunteer security services under Subsection (b), a person may not wear a uniform or badge that:

(1) contains the word "security"; or

(2) gives the person the appearance of being a peace officer, personal protection officer, or security officer.

(d) A peace officer providing volunteer security services under Subsection (b) may:

(1) with the consent of the head of the employing or appointing law enforcement agency, wear the uniform of the agency; or

(2) wear another uniform or badge that gives the person the appearance of being a peace officer.

(e) The reimbursement for or payment of an insurance policy insuring a peace officer who provides volunteer security services under Subsection (b) for civil liability arising from acts occurring while providing those services is not considered compensation or reimbursement.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 967 (S.B. 2065), Sec. 11.001, eff. September 1, 2017.

Amended by:

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 812 (H.B. 1133), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

SUBCHAPTER O. PROHIBITED PRACTICES AND GROUNDS FOR DENIAL AND DISCIPLINARY ACTION

Sec. 1702.361. DENIAL AND DISCIPLINARY ACTIONS; GROUNDS. (a) The commission, for conduct described by Subsection (b), may:

(1) deny an application or revoke, suspend, or refuse to renew a license or security officer commission;

(2) reprimand a license holder or commissioned security officer; or

(3) place on probation a person whose license or security officer commission has been suspended.

(b) The commission shall take disciplinary action described by Subsection (a) on proof:

(1) that the applicant, license holder, majority owner of a license holder, or commissioned security officer has:

(A) violated this chapter or a rule adopted under this chapter;

(B) become ineligible for licensure or a security officer commission under Section 1702.163, if applicable, other than an action for which the department has taken summary action under Section 1702.364;

(C) engaged in fraud, deceit, or misrepresentation;

(D) made a material misstatement in an application for or renewal of a license or commission;

(E) failed to pay in full an administrative penalty assessed under Subchapter R, Chapter 411, Government Code, for which the commission has issued a final order; or

(F) performed any service for which an individual license is required under this chapter and either:

(i) was not employed with a company licensed under this chapter at the time the service was performed; or

(ii) performed the service for a company licensed under this chapter that was not listed on the individual's individual license without informing the department of the individual's employment with the company within a reasonable period; or

(2) that the company license holder employing an individual license holder or commissioned security officer has submitted to the department sufficient evidence that the individual license holder or commissioned security officer:

(A) engaged in fraud or deceit while employed by the company license holder; or

(B) committed theft while performing work as an individual license holder or commissioned security officer.

(c) The commission may place on probation a person whose license is suspended. If a person's suspension of a license is probated, the commission may require the person:

(1) to report regularly to the department on matters that are the basis of the suspension;

(2) to limit practice to the areas prescribed by the commission; or

(3) to continue or review professional education until the person attains a degree of skill satisfactory to the commission in those areas that are the basis of the probation.

(d) The commission may revoke a license or security officer commission if the person holding that credential under this chapter submits payment of a fee or penalty that is returned for insufficient funds and the person has received notice and an opportunity to provide payment in full.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.659, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 906 (H.B. 2833), Sec. 17, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4.87, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4B.18, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1084 (H.B. 3433), Sec. 12, eff. June 14, 2013.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.100, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.363. APPLICATION OF ADMINISTRATIVE PROCEDURE ACT. Except as provided by Section 1702.364, a person regulated under this chapter against whom the commission has taken action is entitled to a hearing before the State Office of Administrative Hearings. A proceeding under this section is a contested case that is governed by Chapter 2001, Government Code.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.662, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4.89, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.101, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.364. SUMMARY ACTIONS. (a) On receiving written notice from a law enforcement agency that a person has been charged with or convicted of an offense that would make the person ineligible for a license or security officer commission under Section 1702.113 or 1702.163, or a rule adopted under Section 1702.004(b), the commission shall:

(1) summarily deny the person's application for a license or security officer commission;

(2) in the event of pending charges, summarily suspend the person's license or security officer commission; or

(3) in the event of a conviction, summarily revoke the person's license or security officer commission.

(b) To initiate a proceeding to take action under Subsection (a), the department must serve notice to the person. The notice must:

(1) inform the person of the person's right to a hearing before the department or the department's designee;

(2) state the basis for the summary action; and

(3) be personally served on the person or the person's authorized representative, or sent to the person by certified or registered mail, return receipt requested, to the person's mailing address as it appears in the department's records.

(c) The action is effective at the time notice is served. The person shall immediately surrender to the department any security officer commission, pocket card, or other form of identification issued by the department.

(d) At a hearing under this section, the person must show cause why:

(1) the application should not have been denied;

(2) the license or security officer commission should not have been suspended; or

(3) the license or commission should not have been revoked.

(e) Chapter 2001, Government Code, applies to a proceeding under this section for the summary denial of an application for or the summary suspension or revocation of a license or security officer commission.

(f) The dismissal of a complaint, information, or indictment or an acquittal releases the person from automatic grounds for a summary denial of an application or summary suspension of a license or security officer commission under this section. A conviction for the offense giving rise to a summary suspension is automatic grounds for immediate, summary revocation.

(g) Repealed by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.114(b)(37), eff. September 1, 2019.

(h) Repealed by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.114(b)(37), eff. September 1, 2019.

(i) Repealed by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.114(b)(37), eff. September 1, 2019.

(j) Repealed by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146, Sec. 4.102(8), eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.663, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 906 (H.B. 2833), Sec. 19, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4.90, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4.102(8), eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1084 (H.B. 3433), Sec. 13, eff. June 14, 2013.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.102, eff. September 1, 2019.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.114(b)(37), eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.365. ABDUCTION OF CHILD. The commission shall revoke a person's license or security officer commission or deny a person's application for, or renewal of, a license or security officer commission on proof that the person or an agent of the person has, after the date of application for a license or security officer commission, abducted or attempted to abduct by force or the threat of force or by misrepresentation, stealth, or unlawful entry a child who at the time of the abduction or attempt is under the care and control of a person who:

(1) has custody or physical possession of the child under a court order; or

(2) is exercising the care and control with the consent of a person who has custody or physical possession of the child under a court order.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.664, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4.91, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.103, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.367. COMPLAINT INVESTIGATION; SUBPOENA; WITNESS. (a) For an investigation conducted under this chapter, if necessary to enforce this chapter or the commission rules adopted under this chapter, the department may issue an administrative subpoena to any person in this state compelling:

(1) the production of information or documents; or

(2) the attendance and testimony of a witness.

(b) A witness is not privileged to refuse to testify to a fact or to produce a record or document with respect to which the witness is properly examined by the hearings officer.

(c) A person required to testify or to produce a record or document on any matter properly under inquiry by the department who refuses to testify or to produce the record or document on the ground that the testimony or the production of the record or document would incriminate or tend to incriminate the person is nonetheless required to testify or to produce the record or document. A person who is required to testify or to produce a record or document under this subsection is not subject to indictment or prosecution for a transaction, matter, or thing concerning which the person truthfully testifies or produces evidence.

(d) If a witness refuses to obey a subpoena or to give evidence relevant to proper inquiry by the department, the department may petition a district court of the county in which the hearing is held to compel the witness to obey the subpoena or to give the evidence. The court shall immediately issue process to the witness and shall hold a hearing on the petition as soon as possible.

(e) An investigator employed by the department may take statements under oath in an investigation of a matter covered by this chapter.

(f) A person licensed or otherwise regulated under this chapter who fails without good cause to comply with a subpoena issued under this section may be subject to suspension of a license under Section 1702.361.

(g) If a subpoena issued under this section relates to an ongoing criminal investigation by the department and the department determines that disclosure could significantly impede the investigation, the subpoena may provide that the person to whom the subpoena is directed may not:

(1) disclose that the subpoena has been issued;

(2) identify or describe any records requested by the subpoena; or

(3) disclose whether records have been furnished in response to the subpoena.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.666, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4.92, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4B.19, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.104, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.368. NOTIFICATION OF CONVICTION FOR CERTAIN OFFENSES. The department shall notify the police department of the municipality and the sheriff's department of the county in which a person licensed or commissioned under this chapter resides of the conviction of the person for a Class B misdemeanor or equivalent offense or a greater offense.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.667(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4.93, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.105, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.369. NO REINSTATEMENT AFTER REVOCATION. A revoked license may not be reinstated.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 1702.370. EFFECT OF SUSPENSION; MONITORING OF EXISTING ALARM CONTRACTS. Subject to expiration of the license under Section 1702.306, a license holder may continue to monitor under an existing alarm contract or contract to monitor under an existing alarm contract for 30 days after the date of suspension of the person's license.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 1702.3705. PROHIBITION AGAINST CERTAIN POLITICAL SUBDIVISIONS ACTING AS ALARM SYSTEMS COMPANY. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (b), a political subdivision may not offer residential alarm system sales, service, installation, or monitoring unless it has been providing monitoring services to residences within the boundaries of the political subdivision as of September 1, 1999. Any fee charged by the political subdivision may not exceed the cost of the monitoring.

(b) A political subdivision may:

(1) offer service, installation, or monitoring for property owned by the political subdivision or another political subdivision;

(2) allow for the response of an alarm or detection device by a law enforcement agency or by a law enforcement officer acting in an official capacity;

(3) offer monitoring in connection with a criminal investigation; or

(4) offer monitoring to a financial institution, as defined by Section 59.301, Finance Code, that requests, in writing, that the political subdivision provide monitoring service to the financial institution.

(c) The limitations of Subsection (a) do not apply to a political subdivision in a county with a population of less than 80,000 or in a political subdivision where monitoring is not otherwise provided or available.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.668(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 1702.372. RECUSAL OF COMMISSION MEMBER. (a) A commission member who participated in the investigation of a complaint of a violation of this chapter or in informal settlement negotiations regarding the complaint:

(1) may not vote on the matter at a commission meeting related to the complaint; and

(2) shall state at the meeting the reason for which the member is prohibited from voting on the matter.

(b) A statement under Subsection (a)(2) shall be entered into the minutes of the meeting.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4.94, eff. September 1, 2009.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.106, eff. September 1, 2019.

SUBCHAPTER P. PENALTIES AND ENFORCEMENT PROVISIONS

Sec. 1702.381. CIVIL PENALTY. (a) A person who is not licensed under this chapter, who does not have a license application pending, and who violates this chapter may be assessed a civil penalty to be paid to the state not to exceed $10,000 for each violation.

(b) A person who contracts with or employs a person who is required to hold a license or security officer commission under this chapter knowing that the person does not hold the required license or commission or who otherwise, at the time of contract or employment, is in violation of this chapter may be assessed a civil penalty to be paid to the state in an amount not to exceed $10,000 for each violation.

(c) A civil penalty under this section may be assessed against a person on proof that the person has received at least 30 days' notice of the requirements of this section.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.670, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 906 (H.B. 2833), Sec. 21, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4.95, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.107, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.382. INJUNCTION. (a) An attorney for the department, the attorney general's office, or any criminal prosecutor in this state may institute an action against a person to enjoin a violation by the person of this chapter or an administrative rule.

(b) An injunction action instituted under this section does not require an allegation or proof that an adequate remedy at law does not exist or that substantial or irreparable damage would result from the continued violation to sustain an action under this section. A bond is not required for an injunction action instituted under this section.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.671, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 906 (H.B. 2833), Sec. 22, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 1702.383. ACTION FOR CIVIL PENALTY OR INJUNCTION. If a person has violated a provision of this chapter for which a penalty is imposed under Section 1702.381, an attorney for the department, the attorney general's office, or any criminal prosecutor in this state may institute a civil suit in a Travis County district court or in a district court in the county in which the violation occurred for injunctive relief under Section 1702.382 or for assessment and recovery of the civil penalty.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.672, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 906 (H.B. 2833), Sec. 23, eff. September 1, 2007.

Sec. 1702.3835. DECEPTIVE TRADE PRACTICE. (a) A person who performs or offers to perform an activity regulated under this chapter, but who is not licensed or otherwise authorized under this chapter to perform the activity, commits a false, misleading, or deceptive act or practice within the meaning of Section 17.46, Business & Commerce Code.

(b) A public or private right or remedy under Chapter 17, Business & Commerce Code, may be used to enforce this chapter.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4B.20, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 1702.384. FALSIFICATION OF CERTAIN DOCUMENTS; OFFENSE. (a) A person commits an offense if the person knowingly falsifies fingerprints or photographs submitted under Section 1702.110.

(b) An offense under this section is a felony of the third degree.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 1702.3841. INSUFFICIENT INSURANCE COVERAGE; OFFENSE. (a) A person commits an offense if the person is subject to Section 1702.124 and knowingly fails to provide and maintain a certificate of insurance or other documentary evidence of insurance sufficient to cover all of the business activities of the person related to private security. A person is presumed to have acted knowingly for purposes of this subsection if the person received reasonable notice from the department and an opportunity to provide or maintain the documentation required by Section 1702.124 and failed to do so.

(b) An offense under this section is a Class A misdemeanor.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1084 (H.B. 3433), Sec. 14, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 1702.386. UNAUTHORIZED EMPLOYMENT; OFFENSE. (a) A person commits an offense if the person contracts with or employs a person who is required to hold a license or commission under this chapter knowing that the person does not hold the required license or commission or who otherwise, at the time of contract or employment, is in violation of this chapter.

(b) An offense under Subsection (a) is a Class A misdemeanor.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4.96, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.108, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.3863. UNAUTHORIZED CONTRACT WITH BAIL BOND SURETY; OFFENSE. (a) A person commits an offense if the person contracts with or is employed by a bail bond surety as defined by Chapter 1704 to secure the appearance of a person who has violated Section 38.10, Penal Code, unless the person is:

(1) a peace officer;

(2) an individual licensed as a private investigator; or

(3) a commissioned security officer employed by a licensed guard company.

(b) An offense under Subsection (a) is a state jail felony.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.673(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4.97, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.109, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.3867. EXECUTION OF CAPIAS OR ARREST WARRANT; OFFENSE. (a) A private investigator executing a capias or an arrest warrant on behalf of a bail bond surety may not:

(1) enter a residence without the consent of the occupants;

(2) execute the capias or warrant without written authorization from the surety;

(3) wear, carry, or display any uniform, badge, shield, or other insignia or emblem that implies that the private investigator is an employee, officer, or agent of the federal government, the state, or a political subdivision of the state; or

(4) notwithstanding Section 9.51, Penal Code, use deadly force.

(b) Notwithstanding Subsection (a)(3), a private investigator may display identification that indicates that the person is acting on behalf of a bail bond surety.

(c) A private investigator executing a capias or an arrest warrant on behalf of a bail bond surety shall immediately take the person arrested to:

(1) if the arrest is made in the county in which the capias or warrant was issued:

(A) the county jail for that county if:

(i) the offense is a Class A or Class B misdemeanor or a felony; or

(ii) the offense is a Class C misdemeanor and the capias or warrant was issued by a magistrate of that county; or

(B) the municipal jail for the appropriate municipality if the offense is a Class C misdemeanor and the capias or warrant was issued by a magistrate of the municipality; or

(2) if the arrest is made in a county other than the county in which the capias or warrant was issued, the county jail for the county in which the arrest is made.

(d) A person commits an offense if the person violates this section. An offense under this section is a state jail felony.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.674(a), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 1702.387. FAILURE TO SURRENDER CERTAIN DOCUMENTS; OFFENSE. (a) A person commits an offense if the person fails to surrender or immediately return to the department the person's commission, pocket card, or other identification issued to the person by the department under this chapter on notification of a summary suspension or summary denial under Section 1702.364.

(b) An offense under this section is a Class A misdemeanor.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 14.675, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4.98, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.110, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.3875. IMPERSONATING SECURITY OFFICER; OFFENSE. (a) A person commits an offense if the person:

(1) impersonates a commissioned or noncommissioned security officer with the intent to induce another to submit to the person's pretended authority or to rely on the person's pretended acts of a security officer; or

(2) knowingly purports to exercise any function that requires licensure as a noncommissioned security officer or a security officer commission.

(b) An offense under this section is a Class A misdemeanor.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 822, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.111, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.3876. IMPERSONATING PRIVATE INVESTIGATOR; OFFENSE. (a) A person commits an offense if the person:

(1) impersonates a private investigator with the intent to induce another to submit to the person's pretended authority or to rely on the person's pretended acts of a private investigator; or

(2) knowingly purports to exercise any function that requires licensure as a private investigator.

(b) An offense under this section is a Class A misdemeanor, except that the offense is a felony of the third degree if it is shown on the trial of the offense that the defendant has previously been convicted of an offense under this section.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 656 (H.B. 1400), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 1702.388. VIOLATION OF CHAPTER; OFFENSE. (a) A person commits an offense if the person violates a provision of this chapter for which a specific criminal penalty is not prescribed.

(b) An offense under this section is a Class A misdemeanor, except that the offense is a felony of the third degree if the person has previously been convicted under this chapter of failing to hold a license, certificate of insurance, or commission that the person is required to hold under this chapter.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 1146 (H.B. 2730), Sec. 4.99, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 595 (S.B. 616), Sec. 5.112, eff. September 1, 2019.

Sec. 1702.389. VENUE. An offense under this chapter may be prosecuted in Travis County or in the county in which the offense occurred.

Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 388, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.